Ancient Rome - Wikipedia
Jump to content Main menu Main menu move to sidebar hide Navigation Main page Contents Current events Random article About Wikipedia Contact us Donate Contribute Help Learn to edit Community portal Recent changes Upload file Search Search Create account Log in Personal tools Create account Log in Pages for logged out editors learn more Contributions Talk Contents move to sidebar hide Top 
1 Early Italy and the founding of Rome 
2 Kingdom 
3 Republic Toggle Republic subsection 
3.1 Punic Wars 
4 Late Republic Toggle Late Republic subsection 
4.1 Caesar and the First Triumvirate 
4.2 Octavian and the Second Triumvirate 
5 Empire  the Principate Toggle Empire  the Principate subsection 
5.1 JulioClaudian dynasty 
5.2 Flavian dynasty 
5.3 NervaAntonine dynasty 
5.4 Severan dynasty 
5.5 Crisis of the Third Century 
6 Empire  The Tetrarchy Toggle Empire  The Tetrarchy subsection 
6.1 Diocletian 
6.2 Constantine and Christianity 
7 Fall of the Western Roman Empire 
8 Society Toggle Society subsection 
8.1 Law 
8.2 Class structure 
8.3 Education 
8.4 Government 
8.5 Military 

8.5.1 Roman navy 
8.6 Economy 
8.7 Family 
8.8 Time and dates 
9 Culture Toggle Culture subsection 
9.1 Language 
9.2 Religion 
9.3 Ethics and morality 
9.4 Art music and literature 

9.4.1 Literature and Libraries 
9.5 Cuisine 
9.6 Fashion 
9.7 Games and recreation 
10 Technology 
11 Legacy 
12 Historiography Toggle Historiography subsection 
12.1 Primary and Secondary sources 
13 See also 
14 References Toggle References subsection 
14.1 Sources 
15 Further reading 
16 External links Toggle the table of contents Ancient Rome 140 languages Afrikaans Alemannisch  Anarkiel   Aragons  Asturianu Avae Azrbaycanca     Bnlmg      Boarisch Bosanski Brezhoneg Catal  Cebuano etina Corsu Cymraeg Dansk Deutsch Din bizaad Eesti  Espaol Esperanto Euskara  Franais Furlan Gaeilge Galego Hakkng  Hausa   Hrvatski Ido Bahasa Indonesia Interlingua Interlingue IsiZulu slenska Italiano  Kaby   Kiswahili  Kreyl ayisyen Kriyl gwiyannen Kurd  Ladin Latina Latvieu Lietuvi Lingua Franca Nova Magyar  Malagasy     Bahasa Melayu   Minangkabau   Mngdngng Mirands Nederlands     Nordfriisk Norsk bokml Norsk nynorsk Occitan Ozbekcha     Patois    Picard Piemontis Plattdtsch Polski Portugus Romn Rumantsch    Sardu Sesotho sa Leboa Shqip Sicilianu  Simple English  Slovenina Slovenina lnski    srpski Srpskohrvatski   Suomi Svenska Tagalog    tatara   Trke Tyap    Ting Vit Vro  Winaray   Yorb  Zazaki  Toli Edit links Article Talk English Read Edit View history Tools Tools move to sidebar hide Actions Read Edit View history General What links here Related changes Upload file Special pages Permanent link Page information Cite this page Get shortened URL Download QR code Wikidata item Printexport Download as PDF Printable version In other projects Wikimedia Commons Wikibooks Wikiquote From Wikipedia the free encyclopedia Roman civilisation from the 
8 th century BC to the 
5 th century AD This article is about the history of Roman civilisation in antiquity. For the history of the city of Rome see History of Rome. For other uses see Ancient Rome disambiguation. Roma 753 BC4764801 AD Motto Senatus Populusque Romanus Territories of the Roman civilisation Roman Republic Roman Empire Western Roman Empire Eastern Roman Empire Status Kingdom 753509 BC Republic 50927 BC Empire 27 BC476 AD Capital Rome and others during the late Empire notably Constantinople and Ravenna Common languages Latin Government Elective absolute monarchy 753509 BC Mixed diarchic constitutional republic 509 BC476 AD only de jure after 27 BC absolute monarchy 27 BC476 AD de facto Historical era Ancient history  Founding of Rome 753 BC  Overthrow of Tarquin the Proud 509 BC  Octavian proclaimed Augustus 27 BC  Collapse of the Western Roman Empire 4764801 AD  Whilst the deposition of Emperor Romulus Augustulus in 476 is the most commonly cited end date for the Western Roman Empire the last Western Roman emperor Julius Nepos was assassinated in 480 when the title and notion of a separate Western Empire were abolished. Another suggested end date is the reorganization of the Italian peninsula and abolition of separate Western Roman administrative institutions under Emperor Justinian during the latter half of the 
6 th century. In modern historiography ancient Rome encompasses the founding of the Italian city of Rome in the 
8 th century BC the Roman Kingdom 753509 BC Roman Republic 50927 BC Roman Empire 27 BC 395 AD and the collapse of the Western Roman Empire in the 
5 th century AD.
1 a Ancient Rome began as an Italic settlement traditionally dated to 753 BC beside the River Tiber in the Italian Peninsula. The settlement grew into the city and polity of Rome and came to control its neighbours through a combination of treaties and military strength. It eventually controlled the Italian Peninsula assimilating the Greek culture of southern Italy Magna Grecia and the Etruscan culture and then became the dominant power in the Mediterranean region and parts of Europe. At its height it controlled the North African coast Egypt Southern Europe and most of Western Europe the Balkans Crimea and much of the Middle East including Anatolia Levant and parts of Mesopotamia and Arabia. That empire was among the largest empires in the ancient world covering around 5 million square kilometres 
1.9  million square miles in AD 1172 with an estimated 50 to 90 million inhabitants roughly 20 of the worlds population at the time.b The Roman state evolved from an elective monarchy to a classical republic and then to an increasingly autocratic military dictatorship during the Empire. Ancient Rome is often grouped into classical antiquity together with ancient Greece and their similar cultures and societies are known as the GrecoRoman world. Ancient Roman civilisation has contributed to modern language religion society technology law politics government warfare art literature architecture and engineering. Rome professionalised and expanded its military and created a system of government called res publica the inspiration for modern republics such as the United States and France.3 It achieved impressive technological and architectural feats such as the empirewide construction of aqueducts and roads as well as more grandiose monuments and facilities. Early Italy and the founding of Romeedit Further information Founding of Rome The Capitoline Wolf now illustrating the legend that a shewolf suckled Romulus and Remus after their mothers imprisonment in Alba Longa Modern reconstruction of the marshy conditions of early Rome along with a conjectural placement of the early settlement and its fortifications Archaeological evidence of settlement around Rome starts to emerge c.1000 BC.4 Largescale organisation appears only c.800 BC with the first graves in the Esquiline Hills necropolis along with a clay and timber wall on the bottom of the Palatine Hill dating to the middle of the 
8 th century BC. Starting from c.650 BC the Romans started to drain the valley between the Capitoline and Palatine Hills where today sits the Roman Forum.5 By the sixth century BC the Romans were constructing the Temple of Jupiter Optimus Maximus on the Capitoline and expanding to the Forum Boarium located between the Capitoline and Aventine Hills.6 The Romans themselves had a founding myth attributing their city to Romulus and Remus offspring of Mars and a princess of the mythical city of Alba Longa.7 The sons sentenced to death were rescued by a wolf and returned to restore the Alban king and found a city. After a dispute Romulus killed Remus and became the citys sole founder. The area of his initial settlement on the Palatine Hill was later known as Roma Quadrata Square Rome. The story dates at least to the third century and the later Roman antiquarian Marcus Terentius Varro placed the citys foundation to 753 BC.8 Another legend recorded by Greek historian Dionysius of Halicarnassus says that Prince Aeneas led a group of Trojans on a sea voyage to found a new Troy after the Trojan War. They landed on the banks of the Tiber River and a woman travelling with them Roma torched their ships to prevent them leaving again. They named the settlement after her.9 The Roman poet Virgil recounted this legend in his classical epic poem the Aeneid where the Trojan prince Aeneas is destined to found a new Troy. Kingdomedit Main article Roman Kingdom Etruscan painting of dancer and musicians from the Tomb of the Leopards in Tarquinia Literary and archaeological evidence is clear on there having been kings in Rome attested in fragmentary 
6 th century BC texts.10 Long after the abolition of the Roman monarchy a vestigial rex sacrorum was retained to exercise the monarchs former priestly functions. The Romans believed that their monarchy was elective with seven legendary kings who were largely unrelated by blood.11 Evidence of Roman expansion is clear in the sixth century BC by its end Rome controlled a territory of some 780 square kilometres 300 square miles with a population perhaps as high as 350
00.1 1 A palace the Regia was constructed c.625 BC11 the Romans attributed the creation of their first popular organisations and the Senate to the regal period as well.12 Rome also started to extend its control over its Latin neighbours. While later Roman stories like the Aeneid asserted that all Latins descended from the titular character Aeneas13 a common culture is attested to archaeologically.14 Attested to reciprocal rights of marriage and citizenship between Latin citiesthe Jus Latiialong with shared religious festivals further indicate a shared culture. By the end of the 
6 th century most of this area had become dominated by the Romans.15 Republicedit Main article Roman Republic The Capitoline Brutus a bust traditionally identified as L. Junius Brutus one of the founders of the Republic Italy in 400 BC just prior to the Celtic invasion under Brennus By the end of the sixth century Rome and many of its Italian neighbours entered a period of turbulence. Archaeological evidence implies some degree of largescale warfare.16 According to tradition and later writers such as Livy the Roman Republic was established c.509 BC 17 when the last of the seven kings of Rome Tarquin the Proud was deposed and a system based on annually elected magistrates and various representative assemblies was established.18 A constitution set a series of checks and balances and a separation of powers. The most important magistrates were the two consuls who together exercised executive authority such as imperium or military command.19 The consuls had to work with the Senate which was initially an advisory council of the ranking nobility or patricians but grew in size and power.20 Other magistrates of the Republic include tribunes quaestors aediles praetors and censors.21 The magistracies were originally restricted to patricians but were later opened to common people or plebeians.22 Republican voting assemblies included the comitia centuriata centuriate assembly which voted on matters of war and peace and elected men to the most important offices and the comitia tributa tribal assembly which elected less important offices.23 In the 
4 th century BC Rome had come under attack by the Gauls who now extended their power in the Italian peninsula beyond the Po Valley and through Etruria. On 16 July 390 BC a Gallic army under the leadership of tribal chieftain Brennus defeated the Romans at the Battle of the Allia and marched to Rome. The Gauls looted and burned the city then laid siege to the Capitoline Hill where some Romans had barricaded themselves for seven months. The Gauls then agreed to give the Romans peace in exchange for 1000 pounds of gold.24 According to later legend the Roman supervising the weighing noticed that the Gauls were using false scales. The Romans then took up arms and defeated the Gauls. Their victorious general Camillus remarked With iron not with gold Rome buys her freedom.25 The Romans gradually subdued the other peoples on the Italian peninsula including the Etruscans.26 The last threat to Roman hegemony in Italy came when Tarentum a major Greek colony enlisted the aid of Pyrrhus of Epirus in 281 BC but this effort failed as well.2726 The Romans secured their conquests by founding Roman colonies in strategic areas thereby establishing stable control over the region.26 Punic Warsedit Main article Punic Wars See also Roman conquest of the Iberian Peninsula Territorial changes over the course of the Punic Wars Roman possessions and close allies Carthaginian Empire and close allies The Roman siege of the Celtiberian stronghold of Numantia in Spain in 133 BC28 In the 
3 rd century BC Rome faced a new and formidable opponent Carthage the other major power in the Western Mediterranean.2930 The First Punic War began in 264 BC when the city of Messana asked for Carthages help in their conflicts with Hiero II of Syracuse. After the Carthaginian intercession Messana asked Rome to expel the Carthaginians. Rome entered this war because Syracuse and Messana were too close to the newly conquered Greek cities of Southern Italy and Carthage was now able to make an offensive through Roman territory along with this Rome could extend its domain over Sicily.31 Carthage was a maritime power and the Roman lack of ships and naval experience made the path to the victory a long and difficult one for the Roman Republic. Despite this after more than 20 years of war Rome defeated Carthage and a peace treaty was signed. Among the reasons for the Second Punic War32 was the subsequent war reparations Carthage acquiesced to at the end of the First Punic War.33 The war began with the audacious invasion of Hispania by Hannibal who marched through Hispania to the Italian Alps causing panic among Romes Italian allies. The best way found to defeat Hannibals purpose of causing the Italians to abandon Rome was to delay the Carthaginians with a guerrilla war of attrition a strategy propounded by Quintus Fabius Maximus Verrucosus. Hannibals invasion lasted over 16 years ravaging Italy but ultimately Carthage was defeated in the decisive Battle of Zama in October 202 BC. More than a half century after these events Carthage was humiliated and the Republics focus now was only to the Hellenistic kingdoms of Greece and revolts in Hispania. However Carthage having paid the war indemnity felt that its commitments and submission to Rome had ceased a vision not shared by the Roman Senate. The Third Punic War began when Rome declared war against Carthage in 149 BC. Carthage resisted well at the first strike but could not withstand the attack of Scipio Aemilianus who entirely destroyed the city enslaved all the citizens and gained control of that region which became the province of Africa. All these wars resulted in Romes first overseas conquests Sicily Hispania and Africa and the rise of Rome as a significant imperial power.3435 Late Republicedit After defeating the Macedonian and Seleucid Empires in the 
2 nd century BC the Romans became the dominant people of the Mediterranean Sea.36 The conquest of the Hellenistic kingdoms brought the Roman and Greek cultures in closer contact and the Roman elite once rural became cosmopolitan. At this time Rome was a consolidated empirein the military viewand had no major enemies. Gaius Marius a general who dramatically reformed the Roman military and was repeatedly elected consul to handle invasions of the Cimbri and Teutones L. Cornelius Sulla leader of the rival optimate party who ultimately marched on Rome twice established himself as dictator massacring opponents and attempting to restore the prerogatives of the Patricians and Senate Foreign dominance led to internal strife. Senators became rich at the provinces expense soldiers who were mostly smallscale farmers were away from home longer and could not maintain their land and the increased reliance on foreign slaves and the growth of latifundia reduced the availability of paid work.37 Income from war booty mercantilism in the new provinces and tax farming created new economic opportunities for the wealthy forming a new class of merchants called the equestrians.38 The lex Claudia forbade members of the Senate from engaging in commerce so while the equestrians could theoretically join the Senate they were severely restricted in political power.3839 The Senate squabbled perpetually repeatedly blocked important land reforms and refused to give the equestrian class a larger say in the government. Violent gangs of the urban unemployed controlled by rival Senators intimidated the electorate through violence. The situation came to a head in the late 
2 nd century BC under the Gracchi brothers a pair of tribunes who attempted to pass land reform legislation that would redistribute the major patrician landholdings among the plebeians. Both brothers were killed and the Senate passed reforms reversing the Gracchi brothers actions.40 This led to the growing divide of the plebeian groups populares and equestrian classes optimates. Gaius Marius soon become a leader of the Republic holding the first of his seven consulships an unprecedented number in 107 BC by arguing that his former patron Quintus Caecilius Metellus Numidicus was not able to defeat and capture the Numidian king Jugurtha. Marius then started his military reform in his recruitment to fight Jugurtha he levied the very poor an innovation and many landless men entered the army. Marius was elected for five consecutive consulships from 104 to 100 BC as Rome needed a military leader to defeat the Cimbri and the Teutones who were threatening Rome. After Mariuss retirement Rome had a brief peace during which the Italian socii allies in Latin requested Roman citizenship and voting rights. The reformist Marcus Livius Drusus supported their legal process but was assassinated and the socii revolted against the Romans in the Social War. At one point both consuls were killed Marius was appointed to command the army together with Lucius Julius Caesar and Lucius Cornelius Sulla.41 By the end of the Social War Marius and Sulla were the premier military men in Rome and their partisans were in conflict both sides jostling for power. In 88 BC Sulla was elected for his first consulship and his first assignment was to defeat Mithridates VI of Pontus whose intentions were to conquer the Eastern part of the Roman territories. However Mariuss partisans managed his installation to the military command defying Sulla and the Senate. To consolidate his own power Sulla conducted a surprising and illegal action he marched to Rome with his legions killing all those who showed support to Mariuss cause. In the following year 87 BC Marius who had fled at Sullas march returned to Rome while Sulla was campaigning in Greece. He seized power along with the consul Lucius Cornelius Cinna and killed the other consul Gnaeus Octavius achieving his seventh consulship. Marius and Cinna revenged their partisans by conducting a massacre.4142 Marius died in 86 BC due to age and poor health just a few months after seizing power. Cinna exercised absolute power until his death in 84 BC. After returning from his Eastern campaigns Sulla had a free path to reestablish his own power. In 83 BC he made his second march in Rome and began a time of terror thousands of nobles knights and senators were executed. Sulla held two dictatorships and one more consulship which began the crisis and decline of Roman Republic.41 Caesar and the First Triumvirateedit Landing of the Romans in Kent 55 BC Caesar with 100 ships and two legions made an opposed landing probably near Deal. After pressing a little way inland against fierce opposition and losing ships in a storm he retired back across the English Channel to Gaul from what was a reconnaissance in force only to return the following year for a more serious invasion. In the mid
1 st century BC Roman politics were restless. Political divisions in Rome split into one of two groups populares who hoped for the support of the people and optimates the best who wanted to maintain exclusive aristocratic control. Sulla overthrew all populist leaders and his constitutional reforms removed powers such as those of the tribune of the plebs that had supported populist approaches. Meanwhile social and economic stresses continued to build Rome had become a metropolis with a superrich aristocracy debtridden aspirants and a large proletariat often of impoverished farmers. The latter groups supported the Catilinarian conspiracya resounding failure since the consul Marcus Tullius Cicero quickly arrested and executed the main leaders. Gaius Julius Caesar reconciled the two most powerful men in Rome Marcus Licinius Crassus who had financed much of his earlier career and Crassus rival Gnaeus Pompeius Magnus anglicised as Pompey to whom he married his daughter. He formed them into a new informal alliance including himself the First Triumvirate three men. Caesars daughter died in childbirth in 54 BC and in 53 BC Crassus invaded Parthia and was killed in the Battle of Carrhae the Triumvirate disintegrated. Caesar conquered Gaul obtained immense wealth respect in Rome and the loyalty of battlehardened legions. He became a threat to Pompey and was loathed by many optimates. Confident that Caesar could be stopped by legal means Pompeys party tried to strip Caesar of his legions a prelude to Caesars trial impoverishment and exile. To avoid this fate Caesar crossed the Rubicon River and invaded Rome in 49 BC. The Battle of Pharsalus was a brilliant victory for Caesar and in this and other campaigns he destroyed all of the optimates leaders Metellus Scipio Cato the Younger and Pompeys son Gnaeus Pompeius. Pompey was murdered in Egypt in 48 BC. Caesar was now preeminent over Rome in five years he held four consulships two ordinary dictatorships and two special dictatorships one for perpetuity. He was murdered in 44 BC on the Ides of March by the Liberatores.43 Octavian and the Second Triumvirateedit Caesars assassination caused political and social turmoil in Rome the city was ruled by his friend and colleague Marcus Antonius. Soon afterward Octavius whom Caesar adopted through his will arrived in Rome. Octavian historians regard Octavius as Octavian due to the Roman naming conventions tried to align himself with the Caesarian faction. In 43 BC along with Antony and Marcus Aemilius Lepidus Caesars best friend44 he legally established the Second Triumvirate. Upon its formation 130300 senators were executed and their property was confiscated due to their supposed support for the Liberatores.45 In 42 BC the Senate deified Caesar as Divus Iulius Octavian thus became Divi filius46 the son of the deified. In the same year Octavian and Antony defeated both Caesars assassins and the leaders of the Liberatores Marcus Junius Brutus and Gaius Cassius Longinus in the Battle of Philippi. The Second Triumvirate was marked by the proscriptions of many senators and equites after a revolt led by Antonys brother Lucius Antonius more than 300 senators and equites involved were executed although Lucius was spared.47 The Triumvirate divided the Empire among the triumvirs Lepidus was given charge of Africa Antony the eastern provinces and Octavian remained in Italia and controlled Hispania and Gaul. The Second Triumvirate expired in 38 BC but was renewed for five more years. However the relationship between Octavian and Antony had deteriorated and Lepidus was forced to retire in 36 BC after betraying Octavian in Sicily. By the end of the Triumvirate Antony was living in Ptolemaic Egypt ruled by his lover Cleopatra VII. Antonys affair with Cleopatra was seen as an act of treason since she was queen of another country. Additionally Antony adopted a lifestyle considered too extravagant and Hellenistic for a Roman statesman.48 Following Antonys Donations of Alexandria which gave to Cleopatra the title of Queen of Kings and to Antonys and Cleopatras children the regal titles to the newly conquered Eastern territories war between Octavian and Antony broke out. Octavian annihilated Egyptian forces in the Battle of Actium in 31 BC. Antony and Cleopatra committed suicide. Now Egypt was conquered by the Roman Empire. Empire  the Principateedit Main article Roman Empire The Augustus of Prima Porta 
1 st century AD depicting Augustus the first Roman emperor In 27 BC and at the age of 36 Octavian was the sole Roman leader. In that year he took the name Augustus. That event is usually taken by historians as the beginning of Roman Empire. Officially the government was republican but Augustus assumed absolute powers.4950 His reform of the government brought about a twocentury period colloquially referred to by Romans as the Pax Romana. JulioClaudian dynastyedit The JulioClaudian dynasty was established by Augustus. The emperors of this dynasty were Augustus Tiberius Caligula Claudius and Nero. The JulioClaudians started the destruction of republican values but on the other hand they boosted Romes status as the central power in the Mediterranean region.51 While Caligula and Nero are usually remembered in popular culture as dysfunctional emperors Augustus and Claudius are remembered as successful in politics and the military. This dynasty instituted imperial tradition in Rome52 and frustrated any attempt to reestablish a Republic.53 Augustus r.27 BC  AD 14 gathered almost all the republican powers under his official title princeps and diminished the political influence of the senatorial class by boosting the equestrian class. The senators lost their right to rule certain provinces like Egypt since the governor of that province was directly nominated by the emperor. The creation of the Praetorian Guard and his reforms in the military creating a standing army with a fixed size of 28 legions ensured his total control over the army.54 Compared with the Second Triumvirates epoch Augustus reign as princeps was very peaceful which led the people and the nobles of Rome to support Augustus increasing his strength in political affairs.55 His generals were responsible for the field command gaining such commanders as Marcus Vipsanius Agrippa Nero Claudius Drusus and Germanicus much respect from the populace and the legions. Augustus intended to extend the Roman Empire to the whole known world and in his reign Rome conquered Cantabria Aquitania Raetia Dalmatia Illyricum and Pannonia.56 Under Augustus reign Roman literature grew steadily in what is known as the Golden Age of Latin Literature. Poets like Virgil Horace Ovid and Rufus developed a rich literature and were close friends of Augustus. Along with Maecenas he sponsored patriotic poems as Virgils epic Aeneid and historiographical works like those of Livy. Augustus continued the changes to the calendar promoted by Caesar and the month of August is named after him.57 Augustus brought a peaceful and thriving era to Rome known as Pax Augusta or Pax Romana. Augustus died in 14 AD but the empires glory continued after his era. Extent of the Roman Empire under Augustus. The yellow legend represents the extent of the Republic in 31 BC the shades of green represent gradually conquered territories under the reign of Augustus and pink areas on the map represent client states areas under Roman control shown here were subject to change even during Augustus reign especially in Germania. The JulioClaudians continued to rule Rome after Augustus death and remained in power until the death of Nero in 68 AD.58 Influenced by his wife Livia Drusilla Augustus appointed her son from another marriage Tiberius as his heir.59 The Senate agreed with the succession and granted to Tiberius the same titles and honours once granted to Augustus the title of princeps and Pater patriae and the Civic Crown. However Tiberius was not an enthusiast for political affairs after agreement with the Senate he retired to Capri in 26 AD60 and left control of the city of Rome in the hands of the praetorian prefect Sejanus until 31 AD and Macro from 31 to 37 AD. Tiberius died or was killed61 in 37 AD. The male line of the JulioClaudians was limited to Tiberius nephew Claudius his grandson Tiberius Gemellus and his grandnephew Caligula. As Gemellus was still a child Caligula was chosen to rule the empire. He was a popular leader in the first half of his reign but became a crude and insane tyrant in his years controlling government.62 The Praetorian Guard murdered Caligula four years after the death of Tiberius63 and with belated support from the senators proclaimed his uncle Claudius as the new emperor.64 Claudius was not as authoritarian as Tiberius and Caligula. Claudius conquered Lycia and Thrace his most important deed was the beginning of the conquest of Britannia.65 Claudius was poisoned by his wife Agrippina the Younger in 54 AD.66 His heir was Nero son of Agrippina and her former husband since Claudius son Britannicus had not reached manhood upon his fathers death. Nero sent his general Suetonius Paulinus to invade modernday Wales where he encountered stiff resistance. The Celts there were independent tough and resistant to tax collectors and fought Paulinus as he battled his way across from east to west. It took him a long time to reach the north west coast and in 60 AD he finally crossed the Menai Strait to the sacred island of Mona Anglesey the last stronghold of the druids.67 His soldiers attacked the island and massacred the druids men women and children68 destroyed the shrine and the sacred groves and threw many of the sacred standing stones into the sea. While Paulinus and his troops were massacring druids in Mona the tribes of modernday East Anglia staged a revolt led by queen Boadicea of the Iceni.69 The rebels sacked and burned Camulodunum Londinium and Verulamium modernday Colchester London and St Albans respectively before they were crushed by Paulinus.70 Boadicea like Cleopatra before her committed suicide to avoid the disgrace of being paraded in triumph in Rome.71 Nero is widely known as the first persecutor of Christians and for the Great Fire of Rome rumoured to have been started by the emperor himself.72 A conspiracy against Nero in 65 AD under Calpurnius Piso failed but in 68 AD the armies under Julius Vindex in Gaul and Servius Sulpicius Galba in modernday Spain revolted. Deserted by the Praetorian Guards and condemned to death by the senate Nero killed himself.73 Flavian dynastyedit Bust of Vespasian founder of the Flavian dynasty The Flavians were the second dynasty to rule Rome.74 By 68 AD the year of Neros death there was no chance of a return to the Roman Republic and so a new emperor had to arise. After the turmoil in the Year of the Four Emperors Titus Flavius Vespasianus anglicised as Vespasian took control of the empire and established a new dynasty. Under the Flavians Rome continued its expansion and the state remained secure.75 Under Trajan the Roman Empire reached the peak of its territorial expansion.76 Romes dominion now spanned 
5.0  million square kilometres 
1.9  million square miles.2 The most significant military campaign undertaken during the Flavian period was the siege and destruction of Jerusalem in 70 AD by Titus. The destruction of the city was the culmination of the Roman campaign in Judea following the Jewish uprising of 66 AD. The Second Temple was completely demolished after which Titus soldiers proclaimed him imperator in honour of the victory. Jerusalem was sacked and much of the population killed or dispersed. Josephus claims that 1100000 people were killed during the siege of whom a majority were Jewish.77 97000 were captured and enslaved including Simon bar Giora and John of Giscala. Many fled to areas around the Mediterranean. Vespasian was a general under Claudius and Nero and fought as a commander in the First JewishRoman War. Following the turmoil of the Year of the Four Emperors in 69 AD four emperors were enthroned in turn Galba Otho Vitellius and lastly Vespasian who crushed Vitellius forces and became emperor.78 He reconstructed many buildings which were uncompleted like a statue of Apollo and the temple of Divus Claudius the deified Claudius both initiated by Nero. Buildings destroyed by the Great Fire of Rome were rebuilt and he revitalised the Capitol. Vespasian started the construction of the Flavian Amphitheater commonly known as the Colosseum.78 The historians Josephus and Pliny the Elder wrote their works during Vespasians reign. Vespasian was Josephus sponsor and Pliny dedicated his Naturalis Historia to Titus son of Vespasian. Vespasian sent legions to defend the eastern frontier in Cappadocia extended the occupation in Britannia modernday England Wales and southern Scotland and reformed the tax system. He died in 79 AD. Titus became emperor in 79. He finished the Flavian Amphitheater using war spoils from the First JewishRoman War and hosted victory games that lasted for a hundred days. These games included gladiatorial combats horse races and a sensational mock naval battle on the flooded grounds of the Colosseum.79 Titus died of fever in 81 AD and was succeeded by his brother Domitian. As emperor Domitian showed the characteristics of a tyrant.80 He ruled for fifteen years during which time he acquired a reputation for selfpromotion as a living god. He constructed at least two temples in honour of Jupiter the supreme deity in Roman religion.81 He was murdered following a plot within his own household. NervaAntonine dynastyedit The Roman Empire reached its greatest extent under Trajan in AD 117 Following Domitians murder the Senate rapidly appointed Nerva as Emperor. Nerva had noble ancestry and he had served as an advisor to Nero and the Flavians. His rule restored many of the traditional liberties of Romes upper classes which Domitian had overridden.8283 The NervaAntonine dynasty from 96 AD to 192 AD included the five good emperors Nerva Trajan Hadrian Antoninus Pius and Marcus Aurelius and ended with Commodus. Nerva abdicated and died in 98 AD and was succeeded by the general Trajan. Trajan is credited with the restoration of traditional privileges and rights of commoner and senatorial classes which later Roman historians claim to have been eroded during Domitians autocracy.84 Trajan fought three Dacian wars winning territories roughly equivalent to modernday Romania and Moldova. He undertook an ambitious public building program in Rome including Trajans Forum Trajans Market and Trajans Column with the architect Apollodorus of Damascus. He remodelled the Pantheon and extended the Circus Maximus.85 When Parthia appointed a king for Armenia without consulting Rome Trajan declared war on Parthia and deposed the king of Armenia. In 115 he took the Northern Mesopotamian cities of Nisibis and Batnae organised a province of Mesopotamia 116 and issued coins that claimed Armenia and Mesopotamia were under the authority of the Roman people.86 In that same year he captured Seleucia and the Parthian capital Ctesiphon near modern Baghdad.87 After defeating a Parthian revolt and a Jewish revolt he withdrew due to health issues and in 117 he died of edema. Map showing the location of Hadrians Wall and the Antonine Wall in Scotland and Northern England Many Romans emigrated to Hispania modernday Spain and Portugal and stayed for generations in some cases intermarrying with Iberians one of these families produced the emperor Hadrian.88 Hadrian withdrew all the troops stationed in Parthia Armenia and Mesopotamia modernday Iraq abandoning Trajans conquests. Hadrians army crushed a revolt in Mauretania and the Bar Kokhba revolt in Judea. This was the last largescale Jewish revolt against the Romans and was suppressed with massive repercussions in Judea. Hundreds of thousands of Jews were killed. Hadrian renamed the province of Judea Provincia Syria Palaestina after one of Judeas most hated enemies.89 He constructed fortifications and walls like the celebrated Hadrians Wall which separated Roman Britannia and the tribes of modernday Scotland. Hadrian promoted culture especially the Greek. He forbade torture and humanised the laws. His many building projects included aqueducts baths libraries and theatres additionally he travelled nearly every province in the Empire to review military and infrastructural conditions.90 Following Hadrians death in 138 AD his successor Antoninus Pius built temples theatres and mausoleums promoted the arts and sciences and bestowed honours and financial rewards upon the teachers of rhetoric and philosophy. On becoming emperor Antoninus made few initial changes leaving intact as far as possible the arrangements instituted by his predecessor. Antoninus expanded Roman Britannia by invading what is now southern Scotland and building the Antonine Wall.91 He also continued Hadrians policy of humanising the laws. He died in 161 AD. The Pantheon Rome built during the reign of Hadrian which still contains the largest unreinforced concrete dome in the world Marcus Aurelius known as the Philosopher was the last of the Five Good Emperors. He was a stoic philosopher and wrote the Meditations. He defeated barbarian tribes in the Marcomannic Wars as well as the Parthian Empire.92 His coemperor Lucius Verus died in 169 AD probably from the Antonine Plague a pandemic that killed nearly five million people through the Empire in 165180 AD.93 From Nerva to Marcus Aurelius the empire achieved an unprecedented status. The powerful influence of laws and manners had gradually cemented the union of the provinces. All the citizens enjoyed and abused the advantages of wealth. The image of a free constitution was preserved with decent reverence. The Roman senate appeared to possess the sovereign authority and devolved on the emperors all the executive powers of government. Gibbon declared the rule of these Five Good Emperors the golden era of the Empire.94 During this time Rome reached its greatest territorial extent.95 Commodus son of Marcus Aurelius became emperor after his fathers death. He is not counted as one of the Five Good Emperors due to his direct kinship with the latter emperor in addition he was militarily passive. Cassius Dio identifies his reign as the beginning of Roman decadence Rome has transformed from a kingdom of gold to one of iron and rust.92 Severan dynastyedit Commodus was killed by a conspiracy involving Quintus Aemilius Laetus and his wife Marcia in late 192 AD. The following year is known as the Year of the Five Emperors during which Helvius Pertinax Didius Julianus Pescennius Niger Clodius Albinus and Septimius Severus held the imperial dignity. Pertinax a member of the senate who had been one of Marcus Aureliuss righthand men was the choice of Laetus and he ruled vigorously and judiciously. Laetus soon became jealous and instigated Pertinaxs murder by the Praetorian Guard who then auctioned the empire to the highest bidder Didius Julianus for 25000 sesterces per man.96 The people of Rome were appalled and appealed to the frontier legions to save them. The legions of three frontier provincesBritannia Pannonia Superior and Syriaresented being excluded from the donative and replied by declaring their individual generals to be emperor. Lucius Septimius Severus Geta the Pannonian commander bribed the opposing forces pardoned the Praetorian Guards and installed himself as emperor. He and his successors governed with the legions support. The changes on coinage and military expenditures were the root of the financial crisis that marked the Crisis of the Third Century. The Severan Tondo c. 199 Severus Julia Domna Caracalla and Geta whose face is erased Severus was enthroned after invading Rome and having Didius Julianus killed. Severus attempted to revive totalitarianism and addressing the Roman people and Senate praised the severity and cruelty of Marius and Sulla which worried the senators.97 When Parthia invaded Roman territory Severus successfully waged war against that country. Notwithstanding this military success Severus failed in invading Hatra a rich Arabian city. Severus killed his legate who was gaining respect from the legions and his soldiers fell victim to famine. After this disastrous campaign he withdrew.98 Severus also intended to vanquish the whole of Britannia. To achieve this he waged war against the Caledonians. After many casualties in the army due to the terrain and the barbarians ambushes Severus himself went to the field. However he became ill and died in 211 AD at the age of 65. Bust of Caracalla from the Capitoline Museums Rome Upon the death of Severus his sons Caracalla and Geta were made emperors. Caracalla had his brother a youth assassinated in his mothers arms and may have murdered 20000 of Getas followers. Like his father Caracalla was warlike. He continued Severus policy and gained respect from the legions. Knowing that the citizens of Alexandria disliked him and were denigrating his character Caracalla served a banquet for its notable citizens after which his soldiers killed all the guests. From the security of the temple of Sarapis he then directed an indiscriminate slaughter of Alexandrias people.99 In 212 he issued the Edict of Caracalla giving full Roman citizenship to all free men living in the Empire with the exception of the dediticii people who had become subject to Rome through surrender in war and freed slaves.100 Mary Beard points to the edict as a fundamental turning point after which Rome was effectively a new state masquerading under an old name.101 Macrinus conspired to have Caracalla assassinated by one of his soldiers during a pilgrimage to the Temple of the Moon in Carrhae in 217 AD. Macrinus assumed power but soon removed himself from Rome to the east and Antioch. His brief reign ended in 218 when the youngster Bassianus high priest of the temple of the Sun at Emesa and supposedly illegitimate son of Caracalla was declared Emperor by the disaffected soldiers of Macrinus. He adopted the name of Antoninus but history has named him after his Sun god Elagabalus represented on Earth in the form of a large black stone. An incompetent and lascivious ruler34 Elagabalus offended all but his favourites. Cassius Dio Herodian and the Historia Augusta give many accounts of his notorious extravagance. Elagabalus adopted his cousin Severus Alexander as Caesar but subsequently grew jealous and attempted to assassinate him. However the Praetorian guard preferred Alexander murdered Elagabalus dragged his mutilated corpse through the streets of Rome and threw it into the Tiber. Severus Alexander then succeeded him. Alexander waged war against many foes including the revitalised Persia and also the Germanic peoples who invaded Gaul. His losses generated dissatisfaction among his soldiers and some of them murdered him during his Germanic campaign in 235 AD.102 Crisis of the Third Centuryedit Main article Crisis of the Third Century The Roman Empire suffered internal schisms forming the Palmyrene Empire and the Gallic Empire A disastrous scenario emerged after the death of Alexander Severus the Roman state was plagued by civil wars external invasions political chaos pandemics and economic depression.10334 The old Roman values had fallen and Mithraism and Christianity had begun to spread through the populace. Emperors were no longer men linked with nobility they usually were born in lowerclasses of distant parts of the Empire. These men rose to prominence through military ranks and became emperors through civil wars. There were 26 emperors in a 
49 year period a signal of political instability. Maximinus Thrax was the first ruler of that time governing for just three years. Others ruled just for a few months like Gordian I Gordian II Balbinus and Hostilian. The population and the frontiers were abandoned since the emperors were mostly concerned with defeating rivals and establishing their power. The economy also suffered massive military expenditures from the Severi caused a devaluation of Roman coins. Hyperinflation came at this time as well. The Plague of Cyprian broke out in 250 and killed a huge portion of the population.104 In 260 AD the provinces of Syria Palaestina Asia Minor and Egypt separated from the rest of the Roman state to form the Palmyrene Empire ruled by Queen Zenobia and centered on Palmyra. In that same year the Gallic Empire was created by Postumus retaining Britannia and Gaul.105 These countries separated from Rome after the capture of emperor Valerian by the Sassanids of Persia the first Roman ruler to be captured by his enemies it was a humiliating fact for the Romans.104 The crisis began to recede during the reigns of Claudius Gothicus 268270 who defeated the Gothic invaders and Aurelian 271275 who reconquered both the Gallic and Palmyrene Empires.106 The crisis was overcome during the reign of Diocletian. Empire  The Tetrarchyedit Main article Tetrarchy Diocletianedit A Roman follis depicting the profile of Diocletian In 284 AD Diocletian was hailed as Imperator by the eastern army. Diocletian healed the empire from the crisis by political and economic shifts. A new form of government was established the Tetrarchy. The Empire was divided among four emperors two in the West and two in the East. The first tetrarchs were Diocletian in the East Maximian in the West and two junior emperors Galerius in the East and Flavius Constantius in the West. To adjust the economy Diocletian made several tax reforms.107 Diocletian expelled the Persians who plundered Syria and conquered some barbarian tribes with Maximian. He adopted many behaviours of Eastern monarchs. Anyone in the presence of the emperor had now to prostrate himselfa common act in the East but never practised in Rome before.108 Diocletian did not use a disguised form of Republic as the other emperors since Augustus had done.109 Between 290 and 330 half a dozen new capitals had been established by the members of the Tetrarchy officially or not Antioch Nicomedia Thessalonike Sirmium Milan and Trier.110 Diocletian was also responsible for a significant Christian persecution. In 303 he and Galerius started the persecution and ordered the destruction of all the Christian churches and scripts and forbade Christian worship.111 Diocletian abdicated in 305 AD together with Maximian thus he was the first Roman emperor to resign. His reign ended the traditional form of imperial rule the Principate from princeps and started the Tetrarchy. The Aula Palatina of Trier Germany then part of the Roman province of Gallia Belgica a Christian basilica built during the reign of Constantine I r. 306337 AD Constantine and Christianityedit Constantine assumed the empire as a tetrarch in 306. He conducted many wars against the other tetrarchs. Firstly he defeated Maxentius in 312. In 313 he issued the Edict of Milan which granted liberty for Christians to profess their religion.112 Constantine was converted to Christianity enforcing the Christian faith. He began the Christianization of the Empire and of Europea process concluded by the Catholic Church in the Middle Ages. He was defeated by the Franks and the Alamanni during 306308. In 324 he defeated another tetrarch Licinius and controlled all the empire as it was before Diocletian. To celebrate his victories and Christianitys relevance he rebuilt Byzantium and renamed it Nova Roma New Rome but the city soon gained the informal name of Constantinople City of Constantine.113 The reign of Julian who under the influence of his adviser Mardonius attempted to restore Classical Roman and Hellenistic religion only briefly interrupted the succession of Christian emperors. Constantinople served as a new capital for the Empire. In fact Rome had lost its central importance since the Crisis of the Third CenturyMediolanum was the western capital from 286 to 330 until the reign of Honorius when Ravenna was made capital in the 
5 th century.114 Constantines administrative and monetary reforms that reunited the Empire under one emperor and rebuilt the city of Byzantium as Constantinopolis Nova Roma changed the high period of the ancient world. Fall of the Western Roman Empireedit Main article Fall of the Western Roman Empire In the late 
4 th and 
5 th centuries the Western Empire entered a critical stage which terminated with the fall of the Western Roman Empire.115 Under the last emperors of the Constantinian dynasty and the Valentinianic dynasty Rome lost decisive battles against the Sasanian Empire and Germanic barbarians in 363 emperor Julian the Apostate was killed in the Battle of Samarra against the Persians and the Battle of Adrianople cost the life of emperor Valens 364378 the victorious Goths were never expelled from the Empire nor assimilated.116 The next emperor Theodosius I 379395 gave even more force to the Christian faith and after his death the Empire was divided into the Eastern Roman Empire ruled by Arcadius and the Western Roman Empire commanded by Honorius both of which were Theodosius sons.117 Ending invasions on Roman Empire between AD 100500. Visigoths entering Athens. The Sack of Rome by the Barbarians in 410 by JosephNol Sylvestre. The situation became more critical in 408 after the death of Stilicho a general who tried to reunite the Empire and repel barbarian invasion in the early years of the 
5 th century. The professional field army collapsed. In 410 the Theodosian dynasty saw the Visigoths sack Rome.118 During the 
5 th century the Western Empire experienced a significant reduction of its territory. The Vandals conquered North Africa the Visigoths claimed the southern part of Gaul Gallaecia was taken by the Suebi Britannia was abandoned by the central government and the Empire suffered further from the invasions of Attila chief of the Huns.119 General Orestes refused to meet the demands of the barbarian allies who now formed the army and tried to expel them from Italy. Unhappy with this their chieftain Odoacer defeated and killed Orestes invaded Ravenna and dethroned Romulus Augustus son of Orestes. This event of 476 usually marks the end of Classical antiquity and beginning of the Middle Ages.120 The Roman noble and former emperor Julius Nepos continued to rule as emperor from Dalmatia even after the deposition of Romulus Augustus until his death in 480. Some historians consider him to be the last emperor of the Western Empire instead of Romulus Augustus.121 After 1200 years of independence and nearly 700 years as a great power the rule of Rome in the West ended.122 Various reasons for Romes fall have been proposed ever since including loss of Republicanism moral decay military tyranny class war slavery economic stagnation environmental change disease the decline of the Roman race as well as the inevitable ebb and flow that all civilisations experience. The Eastern Empire survived for almost 1000 years after the fall of its Western counterpart and became the most stable Christian realm during the Middle Ages. During the 
6 th century Justinian reconquered the Italian peninsula from the Ostrogoths North Africa from the Vandals and southern Hispania from the Visigoths. But within a few years of Justinians death Eastern Roman Byzantine possessions in Italy were greatly reduced by the Lombards who settled in the peninsula.123 In the east partially due to the weakening effect of the Plague of Justinian the Byzantine Romans were threatened by the rise of Islam. Its followers rapidly brought about the conquest of the Levant the conquest of Armenia and the conquest of Egypt during the ArabByzantine wars and soon presented a direct threat to Constantinople.124125 In the following century the Arabs captured southern Italy and Sicily.126 In the west Slavic populations penetrated deep into the Balkans. The Byzantine Romans however managed to stop further Islamic expansion into their lands during the 
8 th century and beginning in the 
9 th century reclaimed parts of the conquered lands.124127 In 1000 AD the Eastern Empire was at its height Basil II reconquered Bulgaria and Armenia and culture and trade flourished.128 However soon after this expansion was abruptly stopped in 1071 with the Byzantine defeat in the Battle of Manzikert. The aftermath of this battle sent the empire into a protracted period of decline. Two decades of internal strife and Turkic invasions ultimately led Emperor Alexios I Komnenos to send a call for help to the Western European kingdoms in 10
95.1 24 The West responded with the Crusades eventually resulting in the Sack of Constantinople by participants of the Fourth Crusade. The conquest of Constantinople in 1204 fragmented what remained of the Empire into successor states the ultimate victor was the Empire of Nicaea.129 After the recapture of Constantinople by Imperial forces the Empire was little more than a Greek state confined to the Aegean coast. The Eastern Roman Byzantine Empire collapsed when Mehmed the Conqueror conquered Constantinople on 29 May 14
53.1 30 Societyedit The Roman Forum the political economic cultural and religious center of the city during the Republic and later Empire The imperial city of Rome was the largest urban center in the empire with a population variously estimated from 450000 to close to one million.131 Around 20 per cent of the population under jurisdiction of ancient Rome 2540 depending on the standards used in Roman Italy132 lived in innumerable urban centers with population of 10000 and more and several military settlements a very high rate of urbanisation by preindustrial standards. Most of those centers had a forum temples and other buildings similar to Romes. The average life expectancy in the Middle Empire was about 2628 years.133134 Lawedit Main article Roman law The roots of the legal principles and practices of the ancient Romans may be traced to the Law of the Twelve Tables promulgated in 449 BC and to the codification of law issued by order of Emperor Justinian I around 530 AD see Corpus Juris Civilis. Roman law as preserved in Justinians codes continued into the Byzantine Roman Empire and formed the basis of similar codifications in continental Western Europe. Roman law continued in a broader sense to be applied throughout most of Europe until the end of the 
17 th century. The major divisions of the law of ancient Rome as contained within the Justinian and Theodosian law codes consisted of Jus civile Jus gentium and Jus naturale. The Jus civile Citizen Law was the body of common laws that applied to Roman citizens.135 The praetores urbani sg. Praetor Urbanus were the people who had jurisdiction over cases involving citizens. The Jus gentium Law of nations was the body of common laws that applied to foreigners and their dealings with Roman citizens.136 The praetores peregrini sg. Praetor Peregrinus were the people who had jurisdiction over cases involving citizens and foreigners. Jus naturale encompassed natural law the body of laws that were considered common to all beings. Class structureedit Main articles Social class in ancient Rome and Status in Roman legal system The Orator c. 100 BC from the National Archaeological Museum of Florence Italy an EtruscoRoman bronze statue depicting Aule Metele Latin Aulus Metellus an Etruscan man wearing a Roman toga while engaged in rhetoric the statue features an inscription in the Etruscan language Roman society is largely viewed as hierarchical with slaves servi at the bottom freedmen liberti above them and freeborn citizens cives at the top. Free citizens were subdivided by class. The broadest and earliest division was between the patricians who could trace their ancestry to one of the 100 patriarchs at the founding of the city and the plebeians who could not. This became less important in the later Republic as some plebeian families became wealthy and entered politics and some patrician families fell economically. Anyone patrician or plebeian who could count a consul as his ancestor was a noble nobilis a man who was the first of his family to hold the consulship such as Marius or Cicero was known as a novus homo new man and ennobled his descendants. Patrician ancestry however still conferred considerable prestige and many religious offices remained restricted to patricians. A class division originally based on military service became more important. Membership of these classes was determined periodically by the censors according to property. The wealthiest were the Senatorial class who dominated politics and command of the army. Next came the equestrians equites sometimes translated knights originally those who could afford a warhorse and who formed a powerful mercantile class. Several further classes originally based on the military equipment their members could afford followed with the proletarii citizens who had no property other than their children at the bottom. Before the reforms of Marius they were ineligible for military service and are often described as being just above freed slaves in wealth and prestige. Voting power in the Republic depended on class. Citizens were enrolled in voting tribes but the tribes of the richer classes had fewer members than the poorer ones all the proletarii being enrolled in a single tribe. Voting was done in class order from top down and stopped as soon as most of the tribes had been reached so the poorer classes were often unable to cast their votes. Women in ancient Rome shared some basic rights with their male counterparts but were not fully regarded as citizens and were thus not allowed to vote or take part in politics. At the same time the limited rights of women were gradually expanded due to emancipation and women reached freedom from pater familias gained property rights and even had more juridical rights than their husbands but still no voting rights and were absent from politics.137 Allied foreign cities were often given the Latin Rights an intermediary level between full citizens and foreigners peregrini which gave their citizens rights under Roman law and allowed their leading magistrates to become full Roman citizens. While there were varying degrees of Latin rights the main division was between those cum suffragio with vote enrolled in a Roman tribe and able to take part in the comitia tributa and sine suffragio without vote could not take part in Roman politics. Most of Romes Italian allies were given full citizenship after the Social War of 9188 BC and full Roman citizenship was extended to all freeborn men in the Empire by Caracalla in 212 with the exception of the dediticii people who had become subject to Rome through surrender in war and freed slaves.100 Educationedit Main article Education in ancient Rome Roman portraiture fresco of a young man with a papyrus scroll from Herculaneum 
1 st century AD In the early Republic there were no public schools so boys were taught to read and write by their parents or by educated slaves called paedagogi usually of Greek origin.138139140 The primary aim of education during this period was to train young men in agriculture warfare Roman traditions and public affairs.138 Young boys learned much about civic life by accompanying their fathers to religious and political functions including the Senate for the sons of nobles.139 The sons of nobles were apprenticed to a prominent political figure at the age of 16 and campaigned with the army from the age of 
17.1 39 Educational practices were modified after the conquest of the Hellenistic kingdoms in the 
3 rd century BC and the resulting Greek influence although Roman educational practices were still much different from Greek ones.139141 If their parents could afford it boys and some girls at the age of 7 were sent to a private school outside the home called a ludus where a teacher called a litterator or a magister ludi and often of Greek origin taught them basic reading writing arithmetic and sometimes Greek until the age of 
11.1 39140142 Beginning at age 12 students went to secondary schools where the teacher now called a grammaticus taught them about Greek and Roman literature.139142 At the age of 16 some students went on to rhetoric school where the teacher usually Greek was called a rhetor.139142 Education at this level prepared students for legal careers and required that the students memorise the laws of Rome.139 Governmentedit Main articles Roman Constitution and History of the Roman Constitution Further information History of citizenship  Roman conceptions of citizenship Initially Rome was ruled by kings who were elected from each of Romes major tribes in turn.143 The exact nature of the kings power is uncertain. He may have held nearabsolute power or may have merely been the chief executive of the Senate and the people. In military matters the kings authority Imperium was likely absolute. He was also the head of the state religion. In addition to the authority of the King there were three administrative assemblies the Senate which acted as an advisory body for the King the Comitia Curiata which could endorse and ratify laws suggested by the King and the Comitia Calata which was an assembly of the priestly college that could assemble the people to bear witness to certain acts hear proclamations and declare the feast and holiday schedule for the next month. Representation of a sitting of the Roman Senate Cicero attacks Catilina from a 
19 thcentury fresco by Cesare Maccari in Palazzo Madama home to Italys Senate The class struggles of the Roman Republic resulted in an unusual mixture of democracy and oligarchy. The word republic comes from the Latin res publica which literally translates to public business. Roman laws traditionally could only be passed by a vote of the Popular assembly Comitia Tributa. Likewise candidates for public positions had to run for election by the people. However the Roman Senate represented an oligarchic institution which acted as an advisory body. In the Republic the Senate held actual authority auctoritas but no real legislative power it was technically only an advisory council. However as the Senators were individually very influential it was difficult to accomplish anything against the collective will of the Senate. New senators were chosen from among the most accomplished patricians by censors Censura who could also remove a senator from his office if he was found morally corrupt a charge that could include bribery or as under Cato the Elder embracing ones wife in public. Later under the reforms of the dictator Sulla quaestors were made automatic members of the Senate though most of his reforms did not survive. The Republic had no fixed bureaucracy and collected taxes through the practice of tax farming. Government positions such as quaestor aedile or praefect were funded by the officeholder. To prevent any citizen from gaining too much power new magistrates were elected annually and had to share power with a colleague. For example under normal conditions the highest authority was held by two consuls. In an emergency a temporary dictator could be appointed. Throughout the Republic the administrative system was revised several times to comply with new demands. In the end it proved inefficient for controlling the everexpanding dominion of Rome contributing to the establishment of the Roman Empire. In the early Empire the pretense of a republican form of government was maintained. The Roman Emperor was portrayed as only a princeps or first citizen and the Senate gained legislative power and all legal authority previously held by the popular assemblies. However the rule of the Emperors became increasingly autocratic and the Senate was reduced to an advisory body appointed by the Emperor. The Empire did not inherit a set bureaucracy from the Republic since the Republic did not have any permanent governmental structures apart from the Senate. The Emperor appointed assistants and advisers but the state lacked many institutions such as a centrally planned budget. Some historians have cited this as a significant reason for the decline of the Roman Empire. Militaryedit Main articles Military history of ancient Rome Military of ancient Rome Structural history of the Roman military Roman army and Roman navy Part of a series on the Military of ancient Rome 753 BC  AD 476 Structural history Army Unit types and ranks Decorations and punishments Legions Auxilia Generals Navy Fleets Admirals Campaign history Wars and battles Technological history Military engineering Castra Siege engines Triumphal arches Roads Political history Strategy and tactics Infantry tactics Frontiers and fortifications Limes Walls Limes Britannicus Antonine Wall Hadrians Wall Saxon Shore Limes Germanicus Alb Limes Lauter Valley Limes Lower Germanic Limes Main Limes NeckarOdenwald Limes Upper GermanicRhaetian Limes Wetterau Limes DanubeIllerRhine Limes Norican Limes Claustra Alpium Iuliarum Pannonian Limes Limes Alutanus Limes Moesiae Trajans Wall Anastasian Wall Limes Sarmatiae Limes Arabicus Limes Tripolitanus Limes Mauretaniae Ancient Rome portal v t e Altar of Domitius Ahenobarbus c. 122 BC the altar shows two Roman infantrymen equipped with long scuta and a cavalryman with his horse. All are shown wearing chain mail armour. Roman tower reconstruction at Limes  Taunus  Germany The early Roman army c.500 BC was like those of other contemporary citystates influenced by Greek civilisation a citizen militia that practised hoplite tactics. It was small and organised in five classes in parallel to the comitia centuriata the body of citizens organised politically with three providing hoplites and two providing light infantry. The early Roman army was tactically limited and its stance during this period was essentially defensive.144145146 By the 
3 rd century BC the Romans abandoned the hoplite formation in favour of a more flexible system in which smaller groups of 120 or sometimes 60 men called maniples could manoeuvre more independently on the battlefield. Thirty maniples arranged in three lines with supporting troops constituted a legion totalling between 4000 and 5000 men.144145 The early Republican legion consisted of five sections the three lines of manipular heavy infantry hastati principes and triarii a force of light infantry velites and the cavalry equites. With the new organisation came a new orientation toward the offensive and a much more aggressive posture toward adjoining citystates.144145 At nominal full strength an early Republican legion included 3600 to 4800 heavy infantry several hundred light infantry and several hundred cavalrymen.144147148 Until the late Republican period the typical legionary was a propertyowning citizen farmer from a rural area an adsiduus who served for particular often annual campaignsc and who supplied his own equipment. After 200 BC economic conditions in rural areas deteriorated as manpower needs increased so that the property qualifications for compulsory service were gradually reduced. Beginning in the 
3 rd century BC legionaries were paid a stipend stipendium. By the time of Augustus the ideal of the citizensoldier had been abandoned and the legions had become fully professional. At the end of the Civil War Augustus reorganised Roman military forces discharging soldiers and disbanding legions. He retained 28 legions distributed through the provinces of the Empire.150 During the Principate the tactical organisation of the Army continued to evolve. The auxilia remained independent cohorts and legionary troops often operated as groups of cohorts rather than as full legions. A new and versatile type of unit the cohortes equitatae combined cavalry and legionaries in a single formation. They could be stationed at garrisons or outposts and could fight on their own as balanced small forces or combine with similar units as a larger legionsized force. This increase in organizational flexibility helped ensure the longterm success of Roman military forces.151 The Emperor Gallienus 253268 AD began a reorganisation that created the last military structure of the late Empire. Withdrawing some legionaries from the fixed bases on the border Gallienus created mobile forces the comitatenses or field armies and stationed them behind and at some distance from the borders as a strategic reserve. The border troops limitanei stationed at fixed bases continued to be the first line of defence. The basic units of the field army were regimental legiones or auxilia for infantry and vexillationes for cavalry. Nominal strengths may have been 1200 men for infantry regiments and 600 for cavalry but actual troop levels could have been much lower800 infantry and 400 cavalry.152 Many infantry and cavalry regiments operated in pairs under the command of a comes. Field armies included regiments recruited from allied tribes and known as foederati. By 400 AD foederati regiments had become permanently established units of the Roman army paid and equipped by the Empire led by a Roman tribune and used just as Roman units were used. The Empire also used groups of barbarians to fight along with the legions as allies without integration into the field armies under overall command of a Roman general but led by their own officers.152 Military leadership evolved over the course of the history of Rome. Under the monarchy the hoplite armies were led by the kings. During the early and middle Roman Republic military forces were under the command of one of the two elected consuls for the year. During the later Republic members of the Roman Senatorial elite as part of the normal sequence of elected public offices known as the cursus honorum would have served first as quaestor often posted as deputies to field commanders then as praetor.153154 Following the end of a term as praetor or consul a Senator might be appointed by the Senate as a propraetor or proconsul depending on the highest office held before to govern a foreign province. Under Augustus whose most important political priority was to place the military under a permanent and unitary command the Emperor was the legal commander of each legion but exercised that command through a legatus legate he appointed from the Senatorial elite. In a province with a single legion the legate commanded the legion legatus legionis and served as provincial governor while in a province with more than one legion each legion was commanded by a legate and the legates were commanded by the provincial governor also a legate but of higher rank.155 During the later stages of the Imperial period beginning perhaps with Diocletian the Augustan model was abandoned. Provincial governors were stripped of military authority and command of the armies in a group of provinces was given to generals duces appointed by the Emperor. These were no longer members of the Roman elite but men who came up through the ranks and had seen much practical soldiering. With increasing frequency these men attempted sometimes successfully to usurp the positions of the Emperors. Decreased resources increasing political chaos and civil war eventually left the Western Empire vulnerable to attack and takeover by neighbouring barbarian peoples.156 Roman navyedit A Roman naval bireme depicted in a relief from the Temple of Fortuna Primigenia in Praeneste Palastrina 157 which was built c.120 BC158 exhibited in the PiusClementine Museum Museo PioClementino in the Vatican Museums. Less is known about the Roman navy than the Roman army. Prior to the middle of the 
3 rd century BC officials known as duumviri navales commanded a fleet of twenty ships used mainly to control piracy. This fleet was given up in 278 AD and replaced by allied forces. The First Punic War required that Rome build large fleets and it did so largely with the assistance of and financing from allies. This reliance on allies continued to the end of the Roman Republic. The quinquereme was the main warship on both sides of the Punic Wars and remained the mainstay of Roman naval forces until replaced by the time of Caesar Augustus by lighter and more manoeuvrable vessels.159 As compared with a trireme the quinquereme permitted the use of a mix of experienced and inexperienced crewmen an advantage for a primarily landbased power and its lesser manoeuvrability permitted the Romans to adopt and perfect boarding tactics using a troop of about 40 marines in lieu of the ram. Ships were commanded by a navarch a rank equal to a centurion who was usually not a citizen. Potter suggests that because the fleet was dominated by nonRomans the navy was considered nonRoman and allowed to atrophy in times of peace.159 Information suggests that by the time of the late Empire 350 AD the Roman navy comprised several fleets including warships and merchant vessels for transportation and supply. Warships were oared sailing galleys with three to five banks of oarsmen. Fleet bases included such ports as Ravenna Arles Aquilea Misenum and the mouth of the Somme River in the West and Alexandria and Rhodes in the East. Flotillas of small river craft classes were part of the limitanei border troops during this period based at fortified river harbours along the Rhine and the Danube. That prominent generals commanded both armies and fleets suggests that naval forces were treated as auxiliaries to the army and not as an independent service. The details of command structure and fleet strengths during this period are not well known although fleets were commanded by prefects.160 Economyedit Main articles Roman agriculture Roman commerce Roman finance Roman currency and Roman metallurgy Workers at a clothprocessing shop in a painting from the fullonica of Veranius Hypsaeus in Pompeii Ancient Rome commanded a vast area of land with tremendous natural and human resources. As such Romes economy remained focused on farming and trade. Agricultural free trade changed the Italian landscape and by the 
1 st century BC vast grape and olive estates had supplanted the yeoman farmers who were unable to match the imported grain price. The annexation of Egypt Sicily and Tunisia in North Africa provided a continuous supply of grains. In turn olive oil and wine were Italys main exports. Twotier crop rotation was practised but farm productivity was low around 1 ton per hectare. Industrial and manufacturing activities were small. The largest such activities were the mining and quarrying of stones which provided basic construction materials for the buildings of that period. In manufacturing production was on a relatively small scale and generally consisted of workshops and small factories that employed at most dozens of workers. However some brick factories employed hundreds of workers. The economy of the early Republic was largely based on smallholding and paid labour. However foreign wars and conquests made slaves increasingly cheap and plentiful and by the late Republic the economy was largely dependent on slave labour for both skilled and unskilled work. Slaves are estimated to have constituted around 20 of the Roman Empires population at this time and 40 in the city of Rome. Only in the Roman Empire when the conquests stopped and the prices of slaves increased did hired labour become more economical than slave ownership. View of Trajans Market built by Apollodorus of Damascus Although barter was used in ancient Rome and often used in tax collection Rome had a very developed coinage system with brass bronze and precious metal coins in circulation throughout the Empire and beyondsome have even been discovered in India. Before the 
3 rd century BC copper was traded by weight measured in unmarked lumps across central Italy. The original copper coins as had a face value of one Roman pound of copper but weighed less. Thus Roman moneys utility as a unit of exchange consistently exceeded its intrinsic value as metal. After Nero began debasing the silver denarius its legal value was an estimated onethird greater than its intrinsic value. Horses were expensive and other pack animals were slower. Mass trade on the Roman roads connected military posts where Roman markets were centered.161 These roads were designed for wheels.162 As a result there was transport of commodities between Roman regions but increased with the rise of Roman maritime trade in the 
2 nd century BC. During that period a trading vessel took less than a month to complete a trip from Gades to Alexandria via Ostia spanning the entire length of the Mediterranean.76 Transport by sea was around 60 times cheaper than by land so the volume for such trips was much larger. Some economists consider the Roman Empire a market economy similar in its degree of capitalistic practices to 
17 th century Netherlands and 
18 th century England.163 Familyedit Main article Family in ancient Rome A gold glass portrait of a family from Roman Egypt. The Greek inscription on the medallion may indicate either the name of the artist or the pater familias who is absent in the portrait.164 A funerary relief with members of the gens Vibia late 
1 st century BC Vatican Museums The basic units of Roman society were households and families.136 Groups of households connected through the male line formed a family gens based on blood ties a common ancestry or adoption. During the Roman Republic some powerful families or Gentes Maiores came to dominate political life. Families were headed by their oldest male citizen the pater familias father of the family who held lawful authority patria potestas fathers power over wives sons daughters and slaves of the household and the familys wealth.136 The extreme expressions of this powerthe selling or killing of family members for moral or civil offences including simple disobediencewere very rarely exercised and were forbidden in the Imperial era. A pater familias had moral and legal duties towards all family members. Even the most despotic pater familias was expected to consult senior members of his household and gens over matters that affected the familys wellbeing and reputation. Traditionally such matters were regarded as outside the purview of the state and its magistrates under the emperors they were increasingly subject to state interference and legislation.165 Once accepted into their birth family by their fathers children were potential heirs. They could not be lawfully given away or sold into slavery. If parents were unable to care for their child or if its paternity was in doubt they could resort to infant exposure Boswell translates this as being offered up to care by the gods or strangers. If a deformed or sickly newborn was patently unfit to live killing it was a duty of the pater familias. A citizen father who exposed a healthy freeborn child was not punished but automatically lost his potestas over that child. Abandoned children were sometimes adopted some would have been sold into slavery.166 Slavery was nearubiquitous and almost universally accepted. In the early Republic citizens in debt were allowed to sell their labour and perhaps their sons to their debtor in a limited form of slavery called nexum but this was abolished in the middle Republic. Freedom was considered a natural and proper state for citizens slaves could be lawfully freed with consent and support of their owners and still serve their owners family and financial interests as freedmen or freed women. This was the basis of the clientpatron relationship one of the most important features of Romes economy and society.167 In law a pater familias held potestas over his adult sons with their own households. This could give rise to legal anomalies such as adult sons also having the status of minors. No man could be considered a pater familias nor could he truly hold property under law while his own father lived.168169 During Romes early history married daughters came under the control manus of their husbands pater familias. By the late Republic most married women retained lawful connection to their birth family though any children from the marriage belonged to her husbands family.170 The mother or an elderly relative often raised both boys and girls.171 Roman moralists held that marriage and childraising fulfilled a basic duty to family gens and the state. Multiple remarriages were not uncommon. Fathers usually began seeking husbands for their daughters when these reached an age between twelve and fourteen but most commonerclass women stayed single until their twenties and in general seem to have been far more independent than wives of the elite. Divorce required the consent of one party along with the return of any dowry. Both parents had power over their children during their minority and adulthood but husbands had much less control over their wives.172 Roman citizen women held a restricted form of citizenship they could not vote but were protected by law. They ran families could own and run businesses own and cultivate land write their own wills and plead in court on their own behalf or on behalf of others all under dispensation of the courts and the nominal supervision of a senior male relative. Throughout the late Republican and Imperial eras a declining birthrate among the elite and a corresponding increase among commoners was cause of concern for many gentes Augustus tried to address this through state intervention offering rewards to any woman who gave birth to three or more children and penalising the childless. The latter was much resented and the former had seemingly negligible results. Aristocratic women seem to have been increasingly disinclined to childbearing it carried a high risk of mortality to mothers and a deal of inconvenience thereafter.173 Time and datesedit See also Roman timekeeping Roman calendar and Roman consul  Consular dating Roman hours were counted ordinally from dawn to dawn. Thus if sunrise was at 6 am then 6 to 7 am was called the first hour. Midday was called meridies and it is from this word that the terms am ante meridiem and pm post meridiem stem. The English word noon comes from nona ninth hour which referred to 3 pm in Ancient Rome.d The Romans had clocks horologia which included giant public sundials solaria and water clocks clepsydrae. The ancient Roman week originally had eight days which were identified by letters A to H with the eighth day being the nundinum or market day a kind of weekend when farmers sold their produce on the streets. The sevenday week first introduced from the East during the early Empire was officially adopted during the reign of Constantine. Romans named week days after celestial bodies from at least the 
1 st century AD. Roman months had three important days the calends first day of each month always in plural the ides 
13 th or 
15 th of the month and the nones ninth day before the ides inclusive i.e. 
5 th or 
7 th of the month. Other days were counted backwards from the next one of these days. The Roman year originally had ten months from Martius March to December with the winter period not included in the calendar. The first four months were named after gods Martius Aprilis Maius Junius and the others were numbered Quintilis Sextilis September October November and December. Numa Pompilius the second king of Rome 716673 BC is said to have introduced the months of January and February both also named after gods beginning the 
12 month calendar still in use today. In 44 BC the month Quintilis was renamed to Julius July after Julius Caesar and in 8 BC Sextilis was renamed to Augustus August after Augustus Caesar. The Romans had several ways of tracking years. One widespread way was the consular dating which identified years by the two consuls who ruled each year. Another way introduced in the late 
3 rd century AD was counting years from the indictio a 
15 year period based on the announcement of the delivery of food and other goods to the government. Another way less popular but more similar to present day was ab urbe condita which counted years from the mythical foundation of Rome in 753 BC. Cultureedit Main article Culture of ancient Rome The seven hills of Rome Life in ancient Rome revolved around the city of Rome located on seven hills. The city had a vast number of monumental structures like the Colosseum the Trajans Forum and the Pantheon. It had theatres gymnasiums marketplaces functional sewers bath complexes complete with libraries and shops and fountains with fresh drinking water supplied by hundreds of miles of aqueducts. Throughout the territory under the control of ancient Rome residential architecture ranged from modest houses to country villas. In the capital city of Rome there were imperial residences on the elegant Palatine Hill from which the word palace derives. The low plebeian and middle equestrian classes lived in the city center packed into apartments or insulae which were almost like modern ghettos. These areas often built by upper class property owners to rent were often centred upon collegia or taberna. These people provided with a free supply of grain and entertained by gladiatorial games were enrolled as clients of patrons among the upper class patricians whose assistance they sought and whose interests they upheld. Languageedit Main article Latin The native language of the Romans was Latin an Italic language the grammar of which relies little on word order conveying meaning through a system of affixes attached to word stems.174 Its alphabet was based on the Etruscan alphabet which was in turn based on the Greek alphabet.175 Although surviving Latin literature consists almost entirely of Classical Latin an artificial and highly stylised and polished literary language from the 
1 st century BC the spoken language of the Roman Empire was Vulgar Latin which significantly differed from Classical Latin in grammar and vocabulary and eventually in pronunciation.176 Speakers of Latin could understand both until the 
7 th century when spoken Latin began to diverge so much that Classical or Good Latin had to be learned as a second language.177 While Latin remained the main written language of the Roman Empire Greek came to be the language spoken by the welleducated elite as most of the literature studied by Romans was written in Greek. Most of the emperors were bilingual but had a preference for Latin in the public sphere for political reasons a practice that first started during the punic wars.178 In the eastern part of the Roman Empire and later the Eastern Roman Empire Latin was never able to replace Greek a legacy of the Hellenistic period.179 Justinian would be the last emperor to use Latin in government and marks when Greek officially took over.180 The expansion of the Roman Empire spread Latin throughout Europe and Vulgar Latin evolved into many distinct Romance languages. Religionedit Main articles Religion in ancient Rome Roman mythology and Roman temple Further information Constantine the Great and Christianity and State church of the Roman Empire Punishment of Ixion in the center is Mercury holding the caduceus and on the right Juno sits on her throne. Behind her Iris stands and gestures. On the left is Vulcan blond figure standing behind the wheel manning it with Ixion already tied to it. Nephele sits at Mercurys feet a Roman fresco from the eastern wall of the triclinium in the House of the Vettii Pompeii Fourth Style 6079 AD. Archaic Roman religion at least concerning the gods was made up not of written narratives but rather of complex interrelations between gods and humans.181 Unlike in Greek mythology the gods were not personified but were vaguely defined sacred spirits called numina. Romans also believed that every person place or thing had its own genius or divine soul. During the Roman Republic Roman religion was organised under a strict system of priestly offices which were held by men of senatorial rank. The College of Pontifices was uppermost body in this hierarchy and its chief priest the Pontifex Maximus was the head of the state religion. Flamens took care of the cults of various gods while augurs were trusted with taking the auspices. The sacred king took on the religious responsibilities of the deposed kings. In the Roman Empire deceased emperors who had ruled well were deified by their successors and the Senate.182 and the formalised imperial cult became increasingly prominent. As contact with the Greeks increased the old Roman gods became increasingly associated with Greek gods.183 Under the Empire the Romans absorbed the mythologies of their conquered subjects often leading to situations in which the temples and priests of traditional Italian deities existed side by side with those of foreign gods.184 Beginning with Emperor Nero in the 
1 st century AD Roman official policy towards Christianity was negative and at some point being a Christian could be punishable by death. Under Emperor Diocletian the persecution of Christians reached its peak. However it became an officially supported religion in the Roman state under Diocletians successor Constantine I with the signing of the Edict of Milan in 313 and quickly became dominant. All religions except Christianity were prohibited in 391 AD by an edict of Emperor Theodosius I.185 Ethics and moralityedit Like many ancient cultures concepts of ethics and morality while sharing some commonalities with modern society differed greatly in several important ways. Because ancient civilisations like Rome were under constant threat of attack from marauding tribes their culture was necessarily militaristic with martial skills being a prized attribute.186 Whereas modern societies consider compassion a virtue Roman society considered compassion a vice a moral defect. Indeed one of the primary purposes of the gladiatorial games was to inoculate Roman citizens from this weakness.187186188 Romans instead prized virtues such as courage and conviction virtus a sense of duty to ones people moderation and avoiding excess moderatio forgiveness and understanding clementia fairness severitas and loyalty pietas.189 Roman society had wellestablished and restrictive norms related to sexuality though as with many societies the lions share of the responsibilities fell on women. Women were generally expected to be monogamous having only a single husband during their life univira though this was much less regarded by the elite especially under the empire. Women were expected to be modest in public avoiding any provocative appearance and to demonstrate absolute fidelity to their husbands pudicitia. Indeed wearing a veil was a common expectation to preserve modesty. Sex outside of marriage was generally frowned upon for men and women and indeed was made illegal during the imperial period.190 Nevertheless prostitution was an accepted and regulated practice.191 Public demonstrations of death violence and brutality were used as a source of entertainment in Roman communities however it was also a way to maintain social order demonstrate power and signify communal unity. Art music and literatureedit Main articles Roman art Latin literature Music of ancient Rome Roman sculpture Theatre of ancient Rome and Art collection in ancient Rome See also Ancient Rome painting Frescoes from the Villa of the Mysteries in Pompeii Italy Roman artwork dated to the mid
1 st century BC Woman playing a kithara from the Villa Boscoreale Italy circa 4030 BC Roman painting styles show Greek influences and surviving examples are primarily frescoes used to adorn the walls and ceilings of country villas though Roman literature includes mentions of paintings on wood ivory and other materials.192193 Several examples of Roman painting have been found at Pompeii and from these art historians divide the history of Roman painting into four periods. The first style of Roman painting was practised from the early 
2 nd century BC to the early or mid
1 st century BC. It was mainly composed of imitations of marble and masonry though sometimes including depictions of mythological characters. The second style began during the early 
1 st century BC and attempted to depict realistically threedimensional architectural features and landscapes. The third style occurred during the reign of Augustus 27 BC  14 AD and rejected the realism of the second style in favour of simple ornamentation. A small architectural scene landscape or abstract design was placed in the center with a monochrome background. The fourth style which began in the 
1 st century AD depicted scenes from mythology while retaining architectural details and abstract patterns. Portrait sculpture used youthful and classical proportions evolving later into a mixture of realism and idealism. During the Antonine and Severan periods ornate hair and bearding with deep cutting and drilling became popular. Advancements were also made in relief sculptures usually depicting Roman victories. Roman music was largely based on Greek music and played an important part in many aspects of Roman life.194 In the Roman military musical instruments such as the tuba a long trumpet or the cornu were used to give various commands while the buccina possibly a trumpet or horn and the lituus probably an elongated Jshaped instrument were used in ceremonial capacities.195 Music was used in the Roman amphitheatres between fights and in the odea and in these settings is known to have featured the cornu and the hydraulis a type of water organ.196 Most religious rituals featured musical performances.197 Some music historians believe that music was used at almost all public ceremonies.194 The graffiti brothels paintings and sculptures found in Pompeii and Herculaneum suggest that the Romans had a sexsaturated culture.198 Literature and Librariesedit Latin literature was from its start influenced heavily by Greek authors. Some of the earliest extant works are of historical epics telling the early military history of Rome. As the Republic expanded authors began to produce poetry comedy history and tragedy. Ancient Romes literary contributions are still recognized today and the works by ancient Roman authors were available in bookshops as well as in public and private libraries. Many scholars and statesmen of Ancient Rome cultivated private libraries that were used both as demonstrations of knowledge and displays of wealth and power.199 Private libraries were so commonly encountered that Vitruvius wrote about where libraries should be situated within a villa.200 In addition to numerous private libraries the Roman Empire saw the establishment of early public libraries. Although Julius Caesar had intended to establish public libraries to further establish Rome as a great cultural center like Athens and Alexandria he died before this was accomplished. Caesars former lieutenant Gaius Asinius Pollio took up the project and opened the first public library in Rome in the Atrium Libertatis.201 Emperors Augustus Tiberius Vespasian Domitian and Trajan also founded or expanded public libraries in Rome during their reigns.202203204 These included the Ulpian Library in Trajans Forum and libraries in the Temple of Apollo Palatinus the Temple of Peace in the Roman Forum the Temple of Divus Augustus which was dedicated to Minerva when it was rebuilt under Emperor Domitians orders.205 Some of these including the library at the Temple of Divus Augustus also served as archives.205 By the fall of the Western Roman Empire the city of Rome had more than two dozen public libraries.206 Rome was not the only city to benefit from such institutions. As the Roman Empire spread public libraries were established in other major cities and cultural centers including Ephesos Athens and Timgad.207208 Most public libraries of this time were not built expressly for that purpose instead sharing space in temples baths and other community buildings. In addition to serving as repositories for books public libraries hosted orations by authors.199 These recitations served as social gatherings and allowed those who may not be literate to be entertained by poetry epics philosophical treatises and other works. Cuisineedit Main articles Ancient Roman cuisine Ancient Rome and wine and Food and dining in the Roman Empire A boy with a platter of fruits and what may be a bucket of crabs in a kitchen with fish and squid on the June panel from a 
3 rdcentury mosaic depicting the months in the Hermitage Museum in St Petersburg Russia209 Ancient Roman cuisine changed over the long duration of this ancient civilisation. Dietary habits were affected by the influence of Greek culture the political changes from Kingdom to Republic to Empire and the Empires enormous expansion which exposed Romans to many new provincial culinary habits and cooking techniques. In the beginning the differences between social classes were relatively small but disparities evolved with the Empires growth. Men and women drank wine with their meals.210 The ancient Roman diet included many items that are staples of modern Italian cooking. Pliny the Elder discussed more than 30 varieties of olive 40 kinds of pear figs native and imported from Africa and the eastern provinces and a wide variety of vegetables including carrots of different colours but not orange211 as well as celery garlic some flower bulbs cabbage and other brassicas such as kale and broccoli lettuce endive onion leek asparagus radishes turnips parsnips beets green peas chard cardoons olives and cucumber.212 However some foods now considered characteristic of modern Italian cuisine were not used.213 In particular spinach and eggplant aubergine were introduced later from the Arab world and tomatoes potatoes capsicum peppers and maize the modern source of polenta212 only appeared in Europe following the discovery of the New World and the Columbian Exchange.213 The Romans knew of rice but it was very rarely available to them. There were also few citrus fruits.213 Butchers meat such as beef was an uncommon luxury. The most popular meat was pork especially sausages.214 Fish was more common than meat with a sophisticated aquaculture and largescale industries devoted to oyster farming. The Romans also engaged in snail farming and oak grub farming. Some fish were greatly esteemed and fetched high prices such as mullet raised in the fishery at Cosa and elaborate means were invented to assure its freshness.215 Traditionally a breakfast called ientaculum216 was served at dawn. At midday to early afternoon Romans ate cena216 the main meal of the day and at nightfall a light supper called vesperna.217 With the increased importation of foreign foods the cena grew larger in size and included a wider range of foods. Thus it gradually shifted to the evening while the vesperna217 was abandoned completely over the course of the years. The midday meal prandium became a light meal to hold one over until cena.216 Fashionedit See also Clothing in ancient Rome Detail of a Paleochristian Roman mosaic from the basilica of Santa Pudenziana in Rome c. 410 AD depicting Saint Pudentiana The toga a common garment during the era of Julius Caesar was gradually abandoned by all social classes of the Empire. At the early 
4 th century the toga had become just a garment worn by senators in Senate and ceremonial events. At the 
4 th century the toga was replaced by the paenula a garment similar to a poncho as the everyday garment of the Romans from the lower classes to the upper classes. Another garment that was popular among the Romans in the later years of the Western Roman Empire was the pallium which was mostly worn by philosophers and scholars in general. Due to external influences mainly from the Germanic peoples the Romans adopted tunics very similar to those used by the Germanic peoples with whom they interacted in the final years of the Western Empire also adopted trousers and hats like the pileus pannonicus. At the Late Empire the paludamentum a type of military clothing was used only by the Emperor of Rome since the reign of Augustus the first emperor while the dalmatic also used by the Christian clergy began to spread throughout the empire.218 Games and recreationedit See also History of physical training and fitness Gladiator combat was strictly a spectator sport. This mosaic shows combatants and referee from the villa at Nennig Germany c.
2 nd
3 rd century AD. The bikini girls mosaic showing women playing sports from the Villa Romana del Casale Italy Roman province of Sicilia 
4 th century AD The youth of Rome had several forms of athletic play and exercise. Play for boys was supposed to prepare them for active military service such as jumping wrestling boxing and racing.219 In the countryside pastimes for the wealthy also included fishing and hunting.220 The Romans also had several forms of ball playing including one resembling handball.219 Dice games board games and gamble games were popular pastimes.219 For the wealthy dinner parties presented an opportunity for entertainment sometimes featuring music dancing and poetry readings.192 The majority less welloff sometimes enjoyed similar parties through clubs or associations but for most Romans recreational dining usually meant patronising taverns.1
92 Children entertained themselves with toys and such games as leapfrog.220192 Public games and spectacles were sponsored by leading Romans who wished to advertise their generosity and court popular approval in Rome or its provinces this usually meant the emperor or his governors. Venues in Rome and the provinces were developed specifically for public games. Romes Colisseum was built in 70 AD under the Roman emperor Vespasian and opened in 80 AD to host other events and gladiatorial combats. Gladiators had an exotic and inventive variety of arms and armour. They sometimes fought to the death but more often to an adjudicated victory usually in keeping with the mood of the watching crowd. Shows of exotic animals were popular in their own right but sometimes animals were pitted against human beings either armed professionals or unarmed criminals who had been condemned to public death. Chariot racing was extremely popular among all classes. In Rome these races were usually held at the Circus Maximus which had been purposebuilt for chariot and horseracing and as Romes largest public place was also used for festivals and animal shows.221 It could seat around 150000 people222 The charioteers raced in teams identified by their colours some aficionados were members of extremely even violently partisan circus factions. Technologyedit Main article Ancient Roman technology Pont du Gard in France is a Roman aqueduct built in c. 19 BC. It is a World Heritage Site. Ancient Rome boasted impressive technological feats using many advancements that were lost in the Middle Ages and not rivalled again until the 
19 th and 
20 th centuries. An example of this is insulated glazing which was not invented again until the 19
30 s. Many practical Roman innovations were adopted from earlier Greek designs. Advancements were often divided and based on craft. Artisans guarded technologies as trade secrets.223 Roman civil engineering and military engineering constituted a large part of Romes technological superiority and legacy and contributed to the construction of hundreds of roads bridges aqueducts public baths theatres and arenas. Many monuments such as the Colosseum Pont du Gard and Pantheon remain as testaments to Roman engineering and culture. The Romans were renowned for their architecture which is grouped with Greek traditions into Classical architecture. Although there were many differences from Greek architecture Rome borrowed heavily from Greece in adhering to strict formulaic building designs and proportions. Aside from two new orders of columns composite and Tuscan and from the dome which was derived from the Etruscan arch Rome had relatively few architectural innovations until the end of the Republic. In the 
1 st century BC Romans started to use Roman concrete widely. Concrete was invented in the late 
3 rd century BC. It was a powerful cement derived from pozzolana and soon supplanted marble as the chief Roman building material and allowed many daring architectural forms.224 Also in the 
1 st century BC Vitruvius wrote De architectura possibly the first complete treatise on architecture in history. In the late 
1 st century BC Rome also began to use glassblowing soon after its invention in Syria about 50 BC. Mosaics took the Empire by storm after samples were retrieved during Lucius Cornelius Sullas campaigns in Greece. The Romans also largely built using timber causing a rapid decline of the woodlands surrounding Rome and in much of the Apennine Mountains due to the demand for wood for construction shipbuilding and fire. The first evidence of longdistance wood trading come from the discovery of wood planks felled between AD 40 and 60 coming from the Jura mountains in northeastern France and ending up more than 1055 miles 1700 km away in the foundations of a lavish portico that was part of a vast wealthy patrician villa in Central Rome. It is suggested that timber around 4 metres 13 ft long came up to Rome via the Tiber River on ships travelling across the Mediterranean Sea from the confluence of the Sane and Rhne rivers in what is now the city of Lyon in presentday France.225 The Appian Way Via Appia a road connecting the city of Rome to the southern parts of Italy remains usable even today With solid foundations and good drainage226 Roman roads were known for their durability and many segments of the Roman road system were still in use a thousand years after the fall of Rome. The construction of a vast and efficient travel network throughout the Empire dramatically increased Romes power and influence. They allowed Roman legions to be deployed rapidly with predictable marching times between key points of the empire no matter the season.227 These highways also had enormous economic significance solidifying Romes role as a trading crossroadsthe origin of the saying all roads lead to Rome. The Roman government maintained a system of way stations known as the cursus publicus and established a system of horse relays allowing a dispatch to travel up to 80 km 50 mi a day. The Romans constructed numerous aqueducts to supply water to cities and industrial sites and to aid in their agriculture. By the third century the city of Rome was supplied by 11 aqueducts with a combined length of 450 km 280 mi. The Romans also made major advancements in sanitation. Romans were particularly famous for their public baths called thermae which were used for both hygienic and social purposes. Many Roman houses had flush toilets and indoor plumbing and a complex sewer system the Cloaca Maxima was used to drain the local marshes and carry waste into the Tiber. Some historians have speculated that lead pipes in the sewer and plumbing systems led to widespread lead poisoning which contributed to fall of Rome however lead content would have been minimised.228229 Legacyedit Main articles Legacy of the Roman Empire and Classics Ancient Rome is the progenitor of Western civilisation.230 The customs religion law technology architecture political system military literature languages alphabet government and many factors and aspects of western civilisation are all inherited from Roman advancements. The rediscovery of Roman culture revitalised Western civilisation playing a role in the Renaissance and the Age of Enlightenment.231 Historiographyedit Primary and Secondary sourcesedit Main article Roman historiography The two longest ancient accounts of the Roman history the histories of Livy and Dionysius of Halicarnassus were composed 500 years later than the date for the founding of the republic and 200 years from the defeat of Hannibal.232 Although there has been a diversity of works on ancient Roman history many of them are lost. As a result of this loss there are gaps in Roman history which are filled by unreliable works such as the Historia Augusta and other books from obscure authors. Historians used their works for the lauding of Roman culture and customs and to flatter their patrons.233 Caesar wrote his own accounts of his military campaigns in Gaul and during the Civil War in part to impress his contemporaries.234 In the Empire the biographies of famous men and early emperors flourished examples being The Twelve Caesars of Suetonius and Plutarchs Parallel Lives. Other major works of Imperial times were that of Livy and Tacitus. Polybius  The Histories Sallust  Bellum Catilinae and Bellum Jugurthinum Julius Caesar  De Bello Gallico and De Bello Civili Livy  Ab urbe condita Dionysius of Halicarnassus  Roman Antiquities Pliny the Elder  Naturalis Historia Josephus  The Jewish War Suetonius  The Twelve Caesars De Vita Caesarum Tacitus  Annales and Histories Plutarch  Parallel Lives a series of biographies of famous Roman and Greek men Cassius Dio  Historia Romana Herodian  History of the Roman Empire since Marcus Aurelius Ammianus Marcellinus  Res Gestae Interest in studying and idealising ancient Rome became prevalent during the Italian Renaissance. Edward Gibbons The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire began the modern study of Roman history in the Englishspeaking world.235 Barthold Georg Niebuhr was a founder of the examination of ancient Roman history and wrote The Roman History tracing the period until the First Punic war. During the Napoleonic The History of Romans by Victor Duruy highlighted the Caesarean period popular at the time. History of Rome Roman constitutional law and Corpus Inscriptionum Latinarum all by Theodor Mommsen236 became milestones. Edward Gibbon  The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire John Bagnall Bury  History of the Later Roman Empire Michael Grant  The Roman World237 Barbara Levick  Claudius238 Barthold Georg Niebuhr Michael Rostovtzeff Howard Hayes Scullard  The History of the Roman World239 Ronald Syme  The Roman Revolution240 Adrian Goldsworthy  Caesar The Life of a Colossus and How Rome fell Mary Beard  SPQR A History of Ancient Rome See alsoedit Civilizations portal Ancient Rome portal Outline of classical studies Outline of ancient Rome Timeline of Roman history Regions in GrecoRoman antiquity List of ancient Romans List of Roman Emperors List of Roman civil wars and revolts Byzantine Empire Roman Army List of archaeologically attested women from the ancient Mediterranean region Referencesedit Footnotes  The specific dates vary depending on whether one follows Roman tradition modern archaeology or competing views of which particular events mark endpoints.  There are several different estimates for the population of the Roman Empire. Scheidel 2006 p. 2 estimates 60 million. Goldsmith 1984 p. 263 estimates 55. Beloch 1886 p. 507 estimates 54. Maddison 2006 pp. 51 120 estimates 48. Roman Empire Population estimates 65 while mentioning several other estimates between 55 and 120. McLynn Frank 2011. Marcus Aurelius Warrior Philosopher Emperor. Random House. p. 3. ISBN 9781446449332. The most likely estimate for the reign of Marcus Aurelius is somewhere between seventy and eighty million. McEvedy and Jones 1978. an average of figures from different sources as listed at the US Census Bureaus Historical Estimates of World Population Archived 13 October 2013 at the Wayback Machine Kremer Michael 1993. Population Growth and Technological Change One Million B.C. to 1990 in The Quarterly Journal of Economics 1083 681716.  Between 343 BC and 241 BC the Roman army fought in every year but five.149  Later in Christian liturgy noon came to describe the nones a time of prayer originally at 3 pm but later at midday so noon became synonymous with midday. Citations  ancient Rome  Facts Maps  History. Encyclopdia Britannica. Retrieved 5 September 2017.  a b Taagepera Rein 1979. Size and Duration of Empires GrowthDecline Curves 600 B.C. to 600 A.D.. Social Science History. 3 34 125. doi
10.2 3071170959. JSTOR 1170959. Turchin Peter Adams Jonathan M. Hall Thomas D December 2006. EastWest Orientation of Historical Empires. Journal of WorldSystems Research. 12 2 222. doi
10.5 1
95 JWSR.20
06.3 69. ISSN 10761
56 X.  Furet Franois Ozouf Mona eds. 1989. A Critical Dictionary of the French Revolution. Harvard University Press. p. 793. ISBN 9780674177284. Luckham Robin White Gordon 1996. Democratization in the South The Jagged Wave. Manchester University Press. p. 11. ISBN 9780719049422. Sellers Mortimer N. 1994. American Republicanism Roman Ideology in the United States Constitution. NYU Press. p. 90. ISBN 9780814780053.  Boatwright 2012 p. 519.  Boatwright 2012 p. 29.  Boatwright 2012 p. 31.  Boatwright 2012 pp. 3132.  Boatwright 2012 p. 32.  Mellor Ronald and McGee Marni The Ancient Roman World p. 15 Cited 15 March 2009.  Boatwright 2012 p. 35. Rex the Latin word for king appears in two fragmentary sixthcentury texts one an inscription from the shrine of Vulcan and the other a potsherd found in the Regia.  a b c Boatwright 2012 p. 36.  Boatwright 2012 p. 37.  Boatwright 2012 p. 39.  Boatwright 2012 p. 40.  Boatwright 2012 p. 42.  Boatwright 2012 p. 43.  Cornell 1995 pp. 215 et seq.  Matyszak 2003 pp. 4344.  Adkins  Adkins 1998 pp. 4142.  Hooker Richard 6 June 1999. Rome The Roman Republic. Washington State University. Archived from the original on 14 May 2011.  Magistratus by George Long M.A. Appearing on pp. 723724 of A Dictionary of Greek and Roman Antiquities by William Smith D.C.L. LL.D. Published by John Murray London 1875. Website 8 December 2006. Retrieved 24 March 2007.  Livius Titus Livy 1998. Book II. The Rise of Rome Books 15. Translated by Luce T.J. Oxford Worlds Classics. ISBN 9780192822963.  Adkins  Adkins 1998 p. 39.  These are literally Roman librae from which the pound is derived.  1 Plutarch Parallel Lives Life of Camillus XXIX 2.  a b c Haywood 1971 pp. 350358.  Pyrrhus of Epirus 2 Archived 14 April 2016 at the Wayback Machine and Pyrrhus of Epirus 3 Archived 3 March 2016 at the Wayback Machine by Jona Lendering. Livius.org. Retrieved 21 March 2007.  Bennett Matthew Dawson Doyne Field Ron Hawthornwaite Philip Loades Mike 2016. The History of Warfare The Ultimate Visual Guide to the History of Warfare from the Ancient World to the American Civil War. p. 61.  Goldsworthy 2006 pp. 2526.  Miles 2011 pp. 175176.  Cassius Dio  Fragments of Book 11. penelope.uchicago.edu. Retrieved 6 September 2022.  New historical atlas and general history By Robert Henlopen Labberton. p. 35.  Caspari Maximilian Otto Bismarck 1911. Punic Wars  The Interval between the First and Second Wars . In Chisholm Hugh ed.. Encyclopdia Britannica. Vol. 22 
11 th ed.. Cambridge University Press. p. 850.  a b c Haywood 1971 pp. 376393.  Hooker Richard 6 June 1999. Rome The Punic Wars. Washington State University. Retrieved 22 March 2007.  Bury John Bagnell 1889. History of the Later Roman Empire. MacMillan and Co. Rome The Conquest of the Hellenistic Empires Archived 1 May 2011 at the Wayback Machine by Richard Hooker. Washington State University. 6 June 1999. Retrieved 22 March 2007.  Duiker  Spielvogel 2001 pp. 136137 Fall of the Roman Republic 13327 BC. Purdue University. Retrieved 24 March 2007.  a b Eques Knight Archived 7 August 2014 at the Wayback Machine by Jona Lendering. Livius.org. Retrieved 24 March 2007.  Adkins  Adkins 1998 p. 38.  Tuma Elias H. 1965. Twentysix Centuries of Agrarian Reform A Comparative Analysis. University of California Press. p. 34.  a b c William Harrison De Puy 1893. The Encyclopdia britannica a dictionary of arts sciences and general literature the R.S. Peale reprint with new maps and original American articles. Werner Co. p. 760.  Henry George Liddell 1855. A history of Rome to the establishment of the empire. p. 305.  Julius Caesar 10044 BC. BBC. Retrieved 21 March 2007.  2 Plutarch Life of Caesar. Retrieved 1 October 2011  Augustus 31 BC  14 AD by Garrett G. Fagan. De Imperatoribus Romanis. 5 July 2004. Retrieved 21 March 2007.  Coins of the Emperor Augustus Archived 25 May 2009 at the Wayback Machine examples are a coin of 38 BC inscribed Divi Iuli filius and another of 31 BC bearing the inscription Divi filius Auguste vu par luimme et par les autres by Juliette Reid Archived 19 March 2009 at the Wayback Machine.  3 Suetonius The Twelve Caesars Augustus XV.  4 Plutarch Parallel Lives Life of Antony LXXI 35.  Augustus 63 BC  AD 14 from bbc.co.uk. Retrieved 12 March 2007.  Langley Andrew and Souza de Philip The Roman Times p. 14 Candle Wick Press 1996  The JulioClaudian Dynasty 27 BC  68 AD. by the Department of Greek and Roman Art The Metropolitan Museum of Art. October 2000. Retrieved 18 March 2007.  James Orr 1915. The International Standard Bible Encyclopaedia. HowardSeverance Company. p. 2598.  Charles Phineas Sherman 1917. Roman law in the modern world. The Boston book company. p. 50.  Werner Eck The Age of Augustus  Pelham Henry Francis 1911. Augustus . In Chisholm Hugh ed.. Encyclopdia Britannica. Vol. 2 
11 th ed.. Cambridge University Press. p. 912.  5 Suetonius The Twelve Caesars Augustus XXI 1.  6 Suetonius The Twelve Caesars Augustus XXI.  Duiker  Spielvogel 2001 p. 140.  7 Suetonius The Twelve Caesars Augustus LXIII.  8 Cassius Dio Roman History LVII 12.  John Charles Tarver 1902. Tiberius the tyrant. A. Constable. pp. 342428. Retrieved 31 May 2012.  Johann Jakob Herzog John Henry Augustus Bomberger 1858. The Protestant Theological and Ecclesiastical Encyclopedia Being a Condensed Translation of Herzogs Real Encyclopedia. Lindsay  Blakiston. p. 99. The Chautauquan. M. Bailey. 1881. p. 445.  Compendium 1858. A compendium of universal history. Ancient and modern by the author of Two thousand questions on the Old and New Testaments. p. 109.  Sir William Smith 1890. AbaeusDysponteus. J. Murray. p. 776.  9 Suetonius The Twelve Caesars Claudius XVII.  Claudius By Barbara Levick. p. 77.  Brief History Brief History of Great Britain. Infobase Publishing. 2009. p. 34.  England Invaded. Amberley Publishing Limited. 2014. p. 27.  In the Name of Rome The Men Who Won the Roman Empire. Hachette UK. 2010. p. 30.  Gaius Suetonius Paulinus. 27 September 2016. Archived from the original on 13 July 2021. Retrieved 21 February 2023.  Making Europe The Story of the West Volume I to 1790. 2013. p. 162.  10 Suetonius The Twelve Caesars Nero XVI. 11 Tacitus Annales XXXVIII.  Nero 5468 AD by Herbert W. Benario. De Imperatoribus Romanis. 10 November 2006. Retrieved 18 March 2007.  Suetonius  OConnell 1989 p. 81 Kreis Stephen. Augustus Caesar and the Pax Romana. The History Guide. Retrieved 21 March 2007.  a b Scarre 1995.  Josephus The Wars of the Jews VI.
9.3   a b Suetonius. The Twelve Caesars Vespasian.  12 Cassius Dio Roman History LXVI. 13 Suetonius The Twelve Caesars Titus VII 3.  14 Suetonius The Twelve Caesars Domitian X.  Titus Flavius Domitianus. Retrieved 29 October 2011.  Cassius Dio  Epitome of Book 68.  Cassius Dio Roman History LXVIII 1.  15 Cassius Dio Roman History LXVIII 6.  16 Cassius Dio Roman History LXVIII 13.  17 Cassius Dio Roman History LXVIII 1730.  Emperors of Rome The Story of Imperial Rome from Julius Caesar to the Last Emperor. Hachette UK. 2014. p. 64.  Encyclopedia of European Peoples. Infobase Publishing. 2006. p. 406.  The Encyclopedia of Christianity Volume 4. Wm. B. Eerdmans Publishing. 2005. p. 15. ISBN 9780802824165.  18 Historia Augusta Life of Hadrian.  19 Historia Augusta Life of Antoninus Pius V 4.  a b Cassius Dio Epitome of Book LXXII Roman History  Past pandemics that ravaged Europe by Verity Murphy. BBC News. 7 November 2005.  Gibbon Edward 1906. Chapter I. In Bury J.B. ed.. The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire. Fred de Fau and Co.  Five Good Emperors from UNRV History. Retrieved 12 March 2007.  Cary 1967 p. 704.  20 Cassius Dio Roman History LXXVI 7.  21 Cassius Dio Roman History LXXVI 912.  22 Cassius Dio Roman History LXXVIII 2223. 23 Historia Augusta The Life of Caracalla VI.  a b Giessen Papyrus 40 79 I grant to all the inhabitants of the Empire the Roman citizenship and no one remains outside a civitas with the exception of the dediticii  Beard Mary 20 October 2015. SPQR A History of Ancient Rome. Profile. pp. 529530. ISBN 9781847654410.  24 Historia Augusta The Life of Alexander Severus LIX.  Skip Knox E.L. Crisis of the Third Century 235285. History of Western Civilization. Boise State University. Archived from the original on 3 May 2007.  a b Gibbon Edward 1906. Chapter X Online version. In Bury J.B. ed.. The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire. Fred de Fau and Co.  25 Historia Augusta The Lives of the Thirty Pretenders III et XXX.  26 Historia Augusta The Life of Aurelian XXXII. 27 Historia Augusta The Life of Claudius I.  Lactantius VII De Mortibus Persecutorum  Joannes Zonaras Epitome From Diocletian to the death of Galerius  Diocletian 284305 AD by Ralph W. Mathisen. De Imperatoribus Romanis. 17 March 1997. Retrieved 20 March 2007.  WardPerkins 1994.  Lactantius XXVI De Mortibus Persecutorum  Gibbon Edward 1906. Chapter XX. In Bury J.B. ed.. The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire. Fred de Fau and Co.  Gibbon Edward 1906. Chapter XVII Online version. In Bury J.B. ed.. The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire. Fred de Fau and Co. Constantine I 306337 AD by Hans A. Pohlsander. De Imperatoribus Romanis. 8 January 2004. Retrieved 20 March 2007.  Honorius 395423 AD by Ralph W. Mathisen. De Imperatoribus Romanis. 2 June 1999. Retrieved 21 March 2007.  Duiker  Spielvogel 2001 pp. 155.  Gibbon Edward 1906. Chapter XXVI Online version. In Bury J.B. ed.. The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire. Fred de Fau and Co.  Un dittico imperiale Oriente e Occidente dopo il 395 in Italian. Retrieved 12 August 2023.  Lapham Lewis 1997. The End of the World. New York Thomas Dunne Books. ISBN 0312252641. pp. 4750.  28 Bury J.B. History of the Later Roman Empire 8 2. 29 Bury J.B. History of the Later Roman Empire 6 4. 30 Bury J.B. History of the Later Roman Empire 6 3. 31 Bury J.B. History of the Later Roman Empire 9. The Germanic Invasions of Western Europe. University of Calgary. August 1996. Archived from the original on 12 August 2013. Retrieved 22 March 2007. Duiker  Spielvogel 2001 p. 157  Roman Emperors  DIR Romulus Augustulus. www.romanemperors.org. 23 July 2022. Romulus Augustulus 475476 AD  Two Views by Ralph W. Mathisen and Geoffrey S. Nathan. De Imperatoribus Romanis. 26 August 1997. Retrieved 22 March 2007.  Mathisen Ralph A. 8 February 1998. Roman Emperors  DIR Nepos.  Durant  Durant 1944 p. 670.  Duiker  Spielvogel 2001 p. 347.  a b c Hooker Richard 6 June 1999. The Byzantine Empire. Washington State University. Archived from the original on 24 February 1999.  Bray R.S. 2004. Armies of Pestilence. James Clarke  Co. p. 26. ISBN 9780227172407.  Kreutz Barbara M. 1996. Before the Normans Southern Italy in the Ninth and Tenth Centuries. University of Pennsylvania Press. ISBN 9780812215878.  Duiker  Spielvogel 2001 p. 349.  Basil II AD 9761025 by Catherine Holmes. De Imperatoribus Romanis. 1 April 2003. Retrieved 22 March 2007.  Gibbon Edward 1906. Chapter LXI Online version. In Bury J.B. ed.. The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire. Fred de Fau and Co.  Mehmet II by Korkut Ozgen. Theottomans.org. Retrieved 3 April 2007.  Duiker  Spielvogel 2001 p. 149 Abstract of The population of ancient Rome. by Glenn R. Storey. HighBeam Research. 1 December 1997. Retrieved 22 April 2007. The Population of Rome by Whitney J. Oates. Originally published in Classical Philology. Vol. 29 No. 2 April 1934 pp. 101116. Retrieved 22 April 2007.  N.Morley Metropolis and Hinterland Cambridge 1996 174183  Gawande Atul 2014. Being Mortal. Profile Books. p. 32. ISBN 9781846685828.  Rossi Lino 1981. Rotocalchi di pietra. Segni e disegni dei tempi sui monumenti trionfali dellImpero romano in Italian. Jaca Book. p. 59. ISBN 9788816400719.  Adkins  Adkins 1998 p. 46.  a b c Duiker  Spielvogel 2001 p. 146.  Frank Frost Abbott Society and Politics in Ancient Rome BiblioBazaar LLC 2009 p. 41  a b Lecture 13 A Brief Social History of the Roman Empire by Steven Kreis. 11 October 2006. Retrieved 2 April 2007.  a b c d e f g h Adkins  Adkins 1998 p. 211.  a b Werner 1978 p. 31.  Duiker  Spielvogel 2001 pp. 143.  a b c Roman Education. Latin ExCET Preparation. Texas Classical Association by Ginny Lindzey September 1998. Retrieved 27 March 2007.  Matyszak 2003 pp. 1642.  a b c d Keegan 1993 pp. 263264.  a b c Potter David 2004. The Roman Army and Navy. pp. 6770. in Flower 2004  For a discussion of hoplite tactics and their sociocultural setting see Hanson Victor Davis 1989. The Western Way of War Infantry Battle in Classical Greece. New York Alfred A. Knopf. ISBN 0394571886.  Goldsworthy 1996 p. 33.  Shelton JoAnn ed. 1998. As the Romans Did A Sourcebook in Roman Social History. New York Oxford University Press. pp. 245249. ISBN 0195089
74 X.  Oakley Stephen P. 2004. The Early Republic. p. 27. in Flower 2004  Mackay 2004 pp. 249250 Mackay points out that the number of legions grew to 30 by 125 AD and 33 during the Severan period 200235 AD.  Goldsworthy 1996 pp. 3637.  a b Elton 1996 pp. 8996.  Brennan Correy T. 2004. Power and Process Under the Republican Constitution. pp. 6668. in Flower 2004  Goldsworthy 1996 pp. 121125.  Mackay 2004 pp. 245252.  Mackay 2004 pp. 295296 Also chapters 2324.  Saddington D.B. 2011 2007. Classes the Evolution of the Roman Imperial Fleets. In Erdkamp Paul ed.. A Companion to the Roman Army. WileyBlackwell. pp. 201217 Plate 
12.2  on p. 204. ISBN 9781405121538.  Coarelli Filippo 1987 I Santuari del Lazio in et repubblicana. NIS Rome pp. 3584.  a b This paragraph is based upon Potter pp. 7678.  Elton 1996 pp. 99101.  Sabin Philip van Wees Hans Whitby Michael eds. 2007. The Cambridge History of Greek and Roman Warfare. Cambridge University Press. p. 231. ISBN 9780521782746.  Heseltine John 2005. Roads to Rome. J. Paul Getty Museum. p. 11. ISBN 9780711225527.  Temin Peter 2001. A Market Economy in the Early Roman Empire. Abstract Archives. Economy History Services. Archived from the original on 15 June 2010.  See Masterpieces. Desiderius Cross. Fondazione Brescia Musei. Archived from the original on 19 October 2021. Retrieved 2 October 2016.. For a description of scholarly research on the Brescia Medallion see Daniel Thomas Howells 2015. A Catalogue of the Late Antique Gold Glass in the British Museum PDF. London the British Museum Arts and Humanities Research Council p. 7. Accessed 2 October 2016. gold glass portrait most likely by an Alexandrian Greek due to the Egyptian dialect of the inscription dated 
3 rd century AD Beckwith John Early Christian and Byzantine Art Penguin History of Art now Yale 
2 nd edn. 1979 ISBN 0140560335 p. 25 Boardman John ed. The Oxford History of Classical Art 1993 OUP ISBN 0198143869 pp. 338340 Grig Lucy Portraits Pontiffs and the Christianization of FourthCentury Rome Papers of the British School at Rome Vol. 72 2004 pp. 203230 JSTOR 40311081 p. 207 Js Elsner 2007. The Changing Nature of Roman Art and the Art Historical Problem of Style in Eva R. Hoffman ed Late Antique and Medieval Art of the Medieval World 1118. Oxford Malden  Carlton Blackwell Publishing. ISBN 9781405120715 p. 17 Figure 
1.3  on p. 18.  Parkin Tim  Pomeroy Arthur Roman Social History a Sourcebook Routledge 2007 p. 72. ISBN 9780415426756  Boswell John Eastburn Expositio and Oblatio The Abandonment of Children and the Ancient and Medieval Family American Historical Review 89 1984 p. 12  Casson 1998 pp. 1011 2432.  Casson 1998 pp. 1011 2432.  Family Values in Ancient Rome by Richard Saller. The University of Chicago Library Digital Collections Fathom Archive. 2001. Visited 14 April 2007.  Adkins  Adkins 1998 pp. 3940.  Rawson Beryl 1987. The Family in Ancient Rome New Perspectives. Cornell University Press. p. 7. ISBN 9780801494604.  Frier Bruce W. and McGinn Thomas A.J. A Casebook on Roman Family Law Oxford University Press American Philological Association 2004 p. 20  Rawson Beryl The Roman Family in The Family in Ancient Rome New Perspectives Cornell University Press 1986 pp. 30 4041. Galinsky Karl Augustan Culture An Interpretive Introduction Princeton University Press 1998 pp. 130132 ISBN 9780691058900  Latin Online Series Introduction Archived 29 April 2015 at the Wayback Machine by Winfred P. Lehmann and Jonathan Slocum. Linguistics Research Center. The University of Texas at Austin. 15 February 2007. Retrieved 1 April 2007.  Calvert J.B. 8 August 1999. The Latin Alphabet. University of Denver. Archived from the original on 3 April 2007.  Classical Latin Supplement. p. 2. Retrieved 2 April 2007.  Jzsef Herman Vulgar Latin English translation 2000 pp. 109114 ISBN 9780271020013  Rochette 2023 p. 263268 Rochette 2018 p. 114115118.  Rochette 2018 pp. 108.  Adkins  Adkins 1998 p. 203 Kaldellis 2023 p. 289 Rochette 2011 p. 562 Rochette 2023 p. 283.  Matyszak 2003 p. 24.  Edward Gibbon 1787. The history of the decline and fall of the Roman Empire. printed for J.J. Tourneisen. p. 91. The Encyclopedia Americana A Library of Universal Knowledge. Encyclopedia Americana Corporation. 1919. p. 644.  Willis 2000 pp. 166168.  Willis 2000.  Theodosius I 379395 AD by David Woods. De Imperatoribus Romanis. 2 February 1999. Retrieved 4 April 2007.  a b Astore William. Bread and Circuses in Rome and America. Retrieved 11 August 2017.  Annual Editions Western Civilization. Vol. 1 
12 th ed.. McGrawHillDushkin. 2002. p. 68. ... where compassion was regarded as a moral defect ...  Jackson Michael Anthony 2004. Look Back to Get Ahead Life Lessons from Historys Heroes. Arcade Publishing. p. 174. ISBN 9781559707275. Gladatorial games were popular because the Romans actually believed that compassion was a vice and a weakness  Harvey Brian K. ed. 2016. Daily Life in Ancient Rome A Sourcebook. Hackett Publishing Company. pp. 2128. ISBN 9781585107964.  Langlands Rebecca 2006. Sexual Morality in Ancient Rome. Cambridge University Press. pp. 320. ISBN 9780521859431.  Mathew Dillon and Lynda Garland 2005. Ancient Rome From the Early Republic to the Assassination of Julius Caesar. Taylor  Francis. p. 382. ISBN 9780415224598.  a b c d Adkins  Adkins 1998 pp. 350352.  Roman Painting from Timeline of Art History. Department of Greek and Roman Art The Metropolitan Museum of Art. 200410. Retrieved 22 April 2007.  a b Grout Donald Jay Palisca Claude V. 1988. A history of western music. Norton. ISBN 9780393956276. Retrieved 31 May 2012.  Adkins  Adkins 1998 p. 89.  Adkins  Adkins 1998 pp. 349350.  Adkins  Adkins 1998 p. 300.  Grant 2005 pp. 130134.  a b Dix T. Keith 1994. Public Libraries in Ancient Rome Ideology and Reality. Libraries  Culture. 29 3 282296. ISSN 08948631. JSTOR 25542662.  Vitruvius Pollio The Ten Books on Architecture BOOK VI CHAPTER IV THE PROPER EXPOSURES OF THE DIFFERENT ROOMS section 1. www.perseus.tufts.edu. Retrieved 29 November 2023.  Pliny the Elder The Natural History BOOK XXXV. AN ACCOUNT OF PAINTINGS AND COLOURS. CHAP. 2. 2.THE HONOUR ATTACHED TO PORTRAITS. www.perseus.tufts.edu. Retrieved 29 November 2023.  Library  Ancient Rome Collections Archives  Britannica. www.britannica.com. Retrieved 29 November 2023.  Houston George W. 2008. Tiberius and the Libraries Public Book Collections and Library Buildings in the Early Roman Empire. Libraries  the Cultural Record. 43 3 247269. doi
10.1 3
53 lac.
0.0 032. ISSN 21663033. S
2 CID 161471143.  Staikos Konstantinos Sp 25 October 2021 The History of the Library in Western Civilization Volume II From Cicero to Hadrian The Roman World from the Beginnings of Latin Literature to the Monumental and Private Libraries of the Empire The History of the Library in Western Civilization Volume II Brill doi
10.1 1639789004473508 ISBN 9789004473508 retrieved 29 November 2023  a b The Roman forum its history and its monuments  Ch. Huelsen  translated by Jesse Benedict Carter. HathiTrust. hdl20
27 njp.32101076187390. Retrieved 29 November 2023.  Boyd C. E. 1915. Public Libraries and Literary Culture in Ancient Rome. University of Chicago Press. ISBN 9781164833970.  Cartwright Mark. Libraries in the Ancient World. World History Encyclopedia. Retrieved 29 November 2023.  Pfeiffer Homer F. 1931. The Roman Library at Timgad. Memoirs of the American Academy in Rome. 9 157165. doi
10.2 3074238558. ISSN 00656801. JSTOR 4238558.  J. Carson Webster The Labors of the Months in Antique and Mediaeval Art to the End of the Twelfth Century Studies in the Humanities 4 Northwestern University Press 1938 p. 128. In the collections of the Hermitage Museum.  Civitello Linda 2011. Cuisine and Culture A History of Food and People. John Wiley  Sons. ISBN 9780470403716.  Phyllis Pray Bober Art Culture and Cuisine Ancient and Medieval Gastronomy University of Chicago Press 2001 p. 188.  a b Patrick Faas Around the Roman Table Food and Feasting in Ancient Rome University of Chicago Press 2005 p. 209.  a b c Phyllis Pray Bober Art Culture and Cuisine Ancient and Medieval Gastronomy University of Chicago Press 2001 p. 187.  Maguelonne ToussaintSamat A History of Food John Wiley  Sons 2009 p. 93.  John E. Stambaugh The Ancient Roman City JHU Press 1988 p. 148.  a b c Artman JohnAncient Rome Independent Learning Unit page 26 Good Apple 1991.  a b Artman JohnAncient Rome Independent Learning Unit p. 26 Good Apple1991.  Dalmatica in Italian. Retrieved 12 August 2023.  a b c Casson 1998 pp. 98108.  a b Daily Life Entertainment. SPQR Online. 1998. Archived from the original on 30 April 2007.  Circus Maximus. Encyclopedia Romana. University of Chicago. Retrieved 19 April 2007.  John Humphrey Roman circuses arenas for chariot racing University of California Press 1986 p. 216.  Ancient Roman laws protected against a person corrupting slaves to obtain secrets about the masters arts. Zeidman Bob 2011. The Software IP Detectives Handbook  Measurement Comparison and Infringement Detection. Prentice Hall. p. 103. ISBN 9780137035335.  Winter Thomas Nelson 1979. Roman Concrete The Ascent Summit and Decline of an Art. Transactions of the Nebraska Academy of Sciences. 7 137143.  Choi Charles Q. 4 December 2019. Muddy Find Shows How Foreign Timber Helped Build Ancient Rome. InsideScience.org. Retrieved 22 May 2020.  Roman road system. Britannica.com. Encyclopaedia Britannica Inc. Retrieved 19 August 2017.  Keegan 1993 p. 303.  Hodge A.T. 1992. Roman Aqueducts and Water Supply. Duckworth. ISBN 9780715621943.  Grout James. Lead Poisoning and Rome. University of Chicago. Archived from the original on 22 July 2011. Retrieved 22 July 2011.  Jacob Dorsey Forrest 1906. The development of western civilization a study in ethical economic and political evolution. The University of Chicago Press. William Cunningham 1900. An Essay on Western Civilization in Its Economic Aspects Mediaeval and modern times. University Press. Retrieved 31 May 2012. Andrew Fleming West Value of the classics. 1917. p. 185  Kuno Fischer 1887. History of modern philosophy. C. Scribners Sons. p. 85. Michael Burger 2008. The Shaping of Western Civilization From Antiquity To the Enlightenment. University of Toronto Press. p. 203. ISBN 9781551114323.  Finley M.I. 2008. Ancient History Evidence and Models. ACLS History. p. 9. ISBN 9781597405348. Unfortunately the two longest ancient accounts of Roman Republican history the area in which the problems are currently the most acute and the most widely discussed the histories of Livy and of Dionysius of Halicarnassus were composed 500 years in very round numbers later than the traditional date for the founding of the Republic 200 years from the defeat of Hannibal.  32 Plutarch Parallel Lives Life of Marius XI 57.  Handford S.A. 1951. Caesar The Conquest of Gaul. Harmondsworth Penguin. p. 24.  Beard Mary 20 October 2015. SPQR A History of Ancient Rome. Profile. pp. 1516. ISBN 9781847654410.  Liukkonen Petri. Theodor Mommsen. Books and Writers kirjasto.sci.fi. Kuusankoski Public Library. Archived from the original on 24 August 2014.  Grant Michael 1987. The World of Rome. Penguin. ISBN 9780452008496.  Levick Barbara 1993. Claudius. Yale University Press. ISBN 9780300058314.  see online editiondead link  Syme Ronald 2002. The Roman Revolution. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780192803207. Sourcesedit Adkins Lesley Adkins Roy A. 1998. Handbook to Life in Ancient Rome. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780195123326. Antonio Margaret L. et al. 8 November 2019. Ancient Rome A genetic crossroads of Europe and the Mediterranean. Science. 366 6466. American Association for the Advancement of Science 708714. Bibcode20
19 Sci...366..7
08 A. doi
10.1 1
26 science.aay6826. PMC 7093155. PMID 31699931. Boatwright Mary T. et al. 2012. The Romans From Village to Empire 
2 nd ed.. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780199730575. OL 250331
42 M. Cary Max 1967. A History of Rome Down to the Reign of Constantine 
2 nd ed.. St. Martins Press. Cassius Dio January 2004. Dios Rome Volume V. Books 6176 AD 54211. Retrieved 17 December 2006. Casson Lionel 1998. Everyday Life in Ancient Rome. The Johns Hopkins University Press. ISBN 9780801859922. Cornell Tim J. 1995. The beginnings of Rome Italy and Rome from the Bronze Age to the Punic Wars c. 1000264 BC. Routledge. OCLC 31515793. Duiker William Spielvogel Jackson 2001. World History 
3 rd ed.. Wadsworth. ISBN 9780534571689. OL 67861
76 M. Durant Will Durant Ariel 1944. The Story of Civilization. Vol. III Caesar and Christ. Simon and Schuster. ISBN 9781567310238. Elton Hugh 1996. Warfare in Roman Europe AD 350425. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780198152415. Flower Harriet I. ed. 2004. The Cambridge Companion to the Roman Republic. Cambridge University Press. ISBN 9780521003902. Gibbon Edward 17761789. The History of the Decline and Fall of the Roman Empire. Goldsworthy Adrian Keith 1996. The Roman Army at War 100 BC  AD 200. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780198150572. Goldsworthy Adrian Keith 2003. The Complete Roman Army. Thames and Hudson Ltd. ISBN 9780500051245. Goldsworthy Adrian Keith 2006. The Fall of Carthage The Punic Wars 265146 BC. Phoenix. ISBN 9780304366422. Goldsworthy Adrian Keith 2008. Caesar Life of a Colossus. Yale University Press. ISBN 9780300126891. Grant Michael 2005. Cities of Vesuvius Pompeii and Herculaneum. Phoenix Press. ISBN 9781898800453. Haywood Richard 1971. The Ancient World. David McKay Company Inc. Kaldellis Anthony 2023. The New Roman Empire A History of Byzantium. New York Oxford University Press. doi
10.1 0
93 oso97801975493
22.0 
01.0 001. ISBN 9780197549322. Keegan John 1993. A History of Warfare. Alfred A. Knopf. ISBN 9780394588018. Livy. The Rise of Rome Books 15 translated from Latin by T.J. Luce 1998. Oxford Worlds Classics. Oxford Oxford University Press. ISBN 0192822969. Mackay Christopher S. 2004. Ancient Rome A Military and Political History. Cambridge University Press. ISBN 9780521809184. Matyszak Philip 2003. Chronicle of the Roman Republic. Thames  Hudson Ltd. ISBN 9780500051214. Miles Richard 2011. Carthage Must be Destroyed. Penguin. ISBN 9780141018096. OConnell Robert 1989. Of Arms and Men A History of War Weapons and Aggression. Oxford University Press. ISBN 9780195053593. Rochette Bruno 2011. Language Policies in the Roman Republic and Empire. A Companion to the Latin Language 549563. doi
10.1 0029781444343397.ch30. hdl226835932. ISBN 9781405186056. Rochette Bruno 2018. Was there a Roman linguistic imperialism during the Republic and the early Principate. Lingue e Linguaggio 12018 107128. doi
10.1 41890426. ISSN 17209331. Rochette Bruno 2023. Mullen Alex ed.. The Attitude of the Roman Emperors towards Language Practices. Social Factors in the Latinization of the Roman West 1 ed.. Oxford Oxford Academic 258285. doi
10.1 0
93 oso97801988872
94.0 
03.0 012. ISBN 9780198887294. Retrieved 22 December 2023. Scarre Chris 1995. The Penguin Historical Atlas of Ancient Rome. Penguin Books. ISBN 9780140513295. Scullard H.H. 1982. From the Gracchi to Nero 
5 th ed.. Routledge. ISBN 9780415025270. Wade Lizzie 8 November 2019. Immigrants from the Middle East shaped Rome. Science. 366 6466. American Association for the Advancement of Science 673. Bibcode20
19 Sci...366..6
73 W. doi
10.1 1
26 science.3
66.6 4
66.6 73. PMID 31699914. S
2 CID 207965960. WardPerkins John Bryan 1994. Roman Imperial Architecture. Yale University Press. ISBN 9780300052923. Werner Paul 1978. Life in Rome in Ancient Times. translated by David Macrae. Editions Minerva S.A. Willis Roy 2000. World Mythology The Illustrated Guide. Ken Fin Books. ISBN 9781864580891. Further readingedit Coarelli Filippo 2007. Rome and environs An archaeological guide. University of California Press. Coulston J. C. Dodge Hazel eds. 2000. Ancient Rome The archaeology of the eternal city. Oxford University School of Archaeology. Forsythe Gary 2005. A critical history of early Rome. University of California Press. Fox Matthew 1996. Roman historical myths The regal period in Augustan literature. Oxford University Press. Gabba Emilio 1991. Dionysius and the history of Archaic Rome. University of California Press. Holloway R. Ross 1994. The archaeology of early Rome and Latium. Routledge. Keaveney Arthur 2005. Rome and the unification of Italy 
2 nd ed.. Bristol Phoenix. Kraus Christina Shuttleworth Woodman A.J. 1997. Latin historians. Oxford University Press. Mitchell Richard E. 1990. Patricians and plebeians The origin of the Roman state. Cornell University Press. Potter T.W. 1987. Roman Italy. University of California Press. Raaflaub Kurt A. ed. 2004. Social struggles in Archaic Rome New perspectives on the conflict of the orders 
2 nd ed.. Blackwell. Rosenstein Nathan S. MorsteinMarx Robert eds. 2006. A companion to the Roman Republic. Blackwell. Scheidel Walter Saller Richard P. Morris Ian 2007. The Cambridge Economic History of the GrecoRoman World. Cambridge University Press. Smith Christopher J. 1996. Early Rome and Latium Economy and society c. 1000500 BC. Oxford University Press. Stewart Roberta 1998. Public office in early Rome Ritual procedure and political practice. University of Michigan Press. Woolf Greg 2012. Rome An Empires Story. Oxford University Press. Wyke Maria 1997. Projecting the Past Ancient Rome Cinema and History. Routledge. External linksedit Wikimedia Commons has media related to Ancient Rome. Library resources about Ancient Rome Online books Resources in your library Resources in other libraries Ancient Rome resources for students from the Courtenay Middle School Library. History of ancient Rome OpenCourseWare from the University of Notre Dame providing free resources including lectures discussion questions assignments and exams. Gallery of the Ancient Art Ancient Rome v t e Ancient Rome topics Outline Timeline History Foundation Kingdom overthrow Republic Empire History Pax Romana Principate Dominate Western Empire fall historiography of the fall Byzantine Empire decline fall Later Roman Empire History Constitution History Kingdom Republic Empire Late Empire Senate Legislative assemblies Curiate Centuriate Tribal Plebeian Executive magistrates SPQR Law Twelve Tables Mos maiorum Citizenship Auctoritas Imperium Status Litigation Government Curia Forum Cursus honorum Collegiality Emperor Legatus Dux Officium Praefectus Vicarius Vigintisexviri Lictor Magister militum Imperator Princeps senatus Pontifex maximus Augustus Caesar Tetrarch Optimates and populares Province Magistrates Ordinary Consul Censor Praetor Tribune Tribune of the plebs Military tribune Quaestor Aedile Promagistrate Governor Extraordinary Rex Interrex Dictator Magister equitum Decemviri Consular tribune Triumvir Military History Borders Establishment Structure Campaigns Political control Strategy Engineering Frontiers and fortifications castra Technology Army Legion Infantry tactics Personal equipment Siege engines Siege in Ancient Rome Navy Auxiliaries Decorations and punishments Hippika gymnasia Economy Agriculture Deforestation Commerce Finance Currency Republican currency Imperial currency Culture Architecture Art Bathing Calendar Clothing Cosmetics Cuisine Education Folklore Hairstyles Literature Music Mythology Religion Deities Romanization Romans Sexuality Spectacles Theatre Toys and games Wine Society Patricians Plebs Conflict of the Orders Secessio plebis Equites Gens Tribes Assembly Patronage Naming conventions Demography Women Marriage Adoption Slavery Bagaudae Technology Amphitheatres Aqueducts Bridges Circuses Civil engineering Concrete Domes Metallurgy Numerals Roads Sanitation Ships Temples Theatres Thermae Latin History Alphabet Versions Old Classical Vulgar Late Medieval Renaissance NeoLatin Contemporary Ecclesiastical Romance languages Writers Latin Aelius Donatus Ammianus Marcellinus Appuleius Asconius Pedianus Augustine Aurelius Victor Ausonius Bothius Caesar Catullus Cassiodorus Censorinus Cicero Claudian Columella Cornelius Nepos Ennius Eutropius Fabius Pictor Sextus Pompeius Festus Rufus Festus Florus Frontinus Fronto Fulgentius Gellius Horace Hydatius Hyginus Jerome Jordanes Julius Paulus Justin Juvenal Lactantius Livy Lucan Lucretius Macrobius Marcellus Empiricus Marcus Aurelius Manilius Martial Nicolaus Damascenus Nonius Marcellus Obsequens Orosius Ovid Petronius Phaedrus Plautus Pliny the Elder Pliny the Younger Pomponius Mela Priscian Propertius Quadrigarius Quintilian Quintus Curtius Rufus Sallust Seneca the Elder Seneca the Younger Servius Sidonius Apollinaris Silius Italicus Statius Suetonius Symmachus Tacitus Terence Tertullian Tibullus Valerius Antias Valerius Maximus Varro Velleius Paterculus Verrius Flaccus Vergil Vitruvius Greek Aelian Atius of Amida Appian Arrian Cassius Dio Diodorus Siculus Diogenes Lartius Dionysius of Halicarnassus Dioscorides Eusebius of Caesaria Galen Herodian Josephus Julian Libanius Lucian Pausanias Philostratus Phlegon of Tralles Photius Plutarch Polyaenus Polybius Porphyrius Priscus Procopius Simplicius of Cilicia Sozomen Stephanus Byzantinus Strabo Themistius Theodoret Zonaras Zosimus Major cities Alexandria Antioch Aquileia Berytus Bononia Carthage Constantinopolis Eboracum Leptis Magna Londinium Lugdunum Lutetia Mediolanum Pompeii Ravenna Roma Smyrna Vindobona Volubilis Lists and other topics Cities and towns Climate Consuls Dictators Distinguished women Dynasties Emperors Empresses Fiction Film Generals Gentes Geographers Institutions Laws Legacy Legions Magistri equitum Nomina Pontifices maximi Praetors Quaestors Tribunes RomanIranian relations External wars and battles Civil wars and revolts v t e Ancient Roman religion and mythology Deities Dii Consentes Agenoria Angerona Anna Perenna Apollo Aurora Bellona Bona Dea Carmenta Castor and Pollux Ceres Cloacina Cupid Dea Dia Diana Dies Ds Pater Egeria Fauna Faunus Flora Genius Hercules Janus Juno Jupiter Lares Lares Familiares Liber Libertas Luna Mars Mercury Minerva Neptune Nox Ops Orcus Penates Pluto Pomona Priapus Proserpina Quirinus Salacia Saturn Silvanus Sol Summanus Venus Veritas Vesta Vertumnus Vulcan Abstract deities Abundantia Aequitas Aeternitas Africa Annona Averruncus Caelus Concordia Feronia Fides Fortuna Fontus Laverna Pax Pietas Roma Salus Securitas Spes Tranquillitas Terra Victoria Legendary figures Aeneas Rhea Silvia Romulus and Remus Numa Pompilius Tullus Hostilius Servius Tullius Ancus Marcius Lucius Tarquinius Priscus Lucius Tarquinius Superbus Kings of Alba Longa Hersilia Legendary beings Shewolf Barnacle goose Texts Virgil Aeneid Ovid Fasti Metamorphoses Propertius Varro Res divinae Sibylline Books Apuleius The Golden Ass Concepts and practices Festivals Interpretatio graeca Imperial cult Charity Palladium Theology of victory Pomerium Temples Celtic Philosophy Cynicism Epicureanism Neoplatonism Peripateticism Pythagoreanism Stoicism Events The Golden Bough Founding of Rome The Rape of the Sabine Women Battle of Lacus Curtius Objects Gubernaculum Pignora imperii Variations GalloRoman Mysteries Cybele Isis Mithraism See also Classical mythology Decline Persecution Etruscan religion Glossary Greek mythology Myth and ritual v t e Roman Constitution Ancient Rome History Constitution Senate Assemblies Curiate Centuriate Tribal Plebeian Magistrates Roman Kingdom History Constitution Senate Assemblies Magistrates Roman Republic History Constitution reforms of Sulla reforms of Caesar reforms of Augustus Senate Assemblies Magistrates Roman Empire History post Diocletian Constitution post Diocletian Senate Assemblies Magistrates Miscellaneous Conflict of the Orders Roman law v t e Roman and Byzantine emperors and empresses regnant Principate 27 BC  AD 235 Augustus Tiberius Caligula Claudius Nero Galba Otho Vitellius Vespasian Titus Domitian Nerva Trajan Hadrian Antoninus Pius Marcus Aurelius Lucius Verus Commodus Pertinax Didius Julianus Septimius Severus Caracalla Geta Macrinus w. Diadumenian Elagabalus Severus Alexander Crisis 235285 Maximinus I Gordian I Gordian II Pupienus Balbinus Gordian III Philip I w. Philip II Decius w. Herennius Etruscus Trebonianus Gallus w. Hostilian  Volusianus Aemilianus Silbannacus  Valerian Gallienus w. Saloninus Claudius II Quintillus Aurelian Tacitus Florianus Probus Carus Carinus Numerian Dominate 284610 Diocletian Maximian Galerius Constantius I Severus II Constantine I Maxentius Licinius Maximinus II Valerius Valens Martinian Constantine II Constantius II Constans I Magnentius Nepotianus Vetranio Julian Jovian Valentinian I Valens Procopius Gratian Theodosius I Valentinian II Magnus Maximus w. Victor Eugenius Western Empire 395480 Honorius Constantine III w. Constans II Priscus Attalus Constantius III Joannes Valentinian III Petronius Maximus Avitus Majorian Severus III Anthemius Olybrius Glycerius Julius Nepos Romulus Augustulus Eastern Empire 395610 Arcadius Theodosius II Marcian Leo I Leo II Zeno Basiliscus w. Marcus Anastasius I Justin I Justinian I Justin II Tiberius II Constantine Maurice w. Theodosius Phocas Eastern Byzantine Empire 6101453 Heraclius Constantine III Heraclonas w. Tiberius Constans II Constantine IV w. Heraclius  Tiberius Justinian II Leontius Tiberius III Justinian II w. Tiberius Philippicus Anastasius II Theodosius III Leo III Constantine V Artabasdos w. Nikephoros Leo IV Constantine VI Irene Nikephoros I Staurakios Michael I Rangabe w. Theophylact  Staurakios Leo V w. Constantine Michael II Theophilos w. Constantine Theodora II w. Thekla Michael III Basil I w. Constantine Leo VI Alexander Constantine VII Romanos I Lekapenos w. Christopher Stephen  Constantine Lekapenos Romanos II Nikephoros II Phokas John I Tzimiskes Basil II Constantine VIII Zoe Romanos III Argyros Michael IV Michael V Constantine IX Monomachos Theodora III Michael VI Bringas Isaac I Komnenos Constantine X Doukas Eudokia Makrembolitissa Romanos IV Diogenes w. Leo  Nikephoros Michael VII Doukas w. Andronikos Konstantios  Constantine Doukas Nikephoros III Botaneiates Alexios I Komnenos w. Constantine Doukas John II Komnenos w. Alexios Manuel I Komnenos Alexios II Komnenos Andronikos I Komnenos w. John Isaac II Angelos Alexios III Angelos Alexios IV Angelos Alexios V Doukas Theodore I Laskaris w. Nicholas John III Vatatzes Theodore II Laskaris John IV Laskaris Michael VIII Palaiologos Andronikos II Palaiologos Michael IX Palaiologos Andronikos III Palaiologos John V Palaiologos John VI Kantakouzenos w. Matthew Andronikos IV Palaiologos John VII Palaiologos w. Andronikos V Manuel II Palaiologos John VIII Palaiologos Constantine XI Palaiologos See also Gallic emperors 260274 Palmyrene emperors 267273 Britannic emperors 286296 Trapezuntine emperors 12041461 Thessalonian emperors 12241242 Empresses Augustae Usurpers Classical Eastern Italics indicates a junior coemperor underlining indicates an emperor variously regarded as either legitimate or a usurper v t e Ancient Roman wars Wars of the Roman Republic Roman conquest of Italy RomanEtruscan Wars RomanAequian wars RomanLatin wars RomanHernician wars RomanVolscian wars RomanSabine wars Samnite Wars Pyrrhic War Social War RomanGallic wars Punic Wars First Second Third IllyroRoman Wars Macedonian Wars First Second Third Fourth RomanSeleucid war Galatian War Roman conquest of the Iberian Peninsula Celtiberian Wars Lusitanian War Numantine War Sertorian War Cantabrian Wars Achaean War Jugurthine War Cimbrian War Servile Wars First Second Third Bellum Octavianum Sullas civil war Mithridatic Wars First Second Third Gallic Wars Julius Caesars invasions of Britain RomanParthian Wars Caesars civil war War of Mutina Liberators civil war Bellum Siculum Perusine War War of Actium Wars of the Roman Empire Germanic wars Marcomannic Wars Gothic War Roman conquest of Britain Boudican revolt Armenian War Civil war of 69 JewishRoman wars Domitians Dacian War Trajans Dacian Wars RomanPersian Wars Civil wars of the Third Century Wars of the fall of the Western Roman Empire Military history of ancient Rome v t e Colonies of Ancient Rome With correspondence to modern geography Europe Britannia Superior Camulodunum Lindum Colonia Londinium Britannia Inferior Eboracum Roman Dacia Ulpia Traiana Sarmizegetusa Gallia Lugdunensis Lugdunum Gallia Narbonensis Narbo Martius Germania Inferior Colonia Claudia Ara Agrippinensium Mogontiacum Hispania Augusta Emerita Italia Aelia Augusta Aeclanum Castra Taurinorum Florentia Mediolanum Placentia Moesia Singidunum Levant Of legion veterans Berytus Caesarea Maritima 2 Aelia Capitolina 1 3 Ptolemais 1 Of late Empire Laodicea Antioch Seleucia Emesa Heliopolis 1 Palmyra 1 3 Damascus 1 3 Arca Caesarea Sidon Tyrus 1 Sebaste Bostra 1 3 Petra 1 Neapolis Philippopolis DuraEuropos 2 Possible colonies Gaza Ascalon Gerasa Gadara Emmaus Nicopolis Neronias Locations with modern names Israel and the Palestinian territories Jerusalem Aelia Capitolina Acre Ptolemais Caesarea Maritima Imwas Emmaus Nicopolis Banias Neronias Jordan Petra Umm Qais Gadara Jerash Gerasa Lebanon Arqa Arca Caesarea Beirut Berytus Baalbek Heliopolis Saida Sidon Tyre Tyrus Syria Bosra Bostra Damascus DuraEuropos Homs Emesa Latakia Laodicea Shahba Philippopolis Tadmur Palmyra Turkey Antakya Antioch Samanda Seleucia 1 UNESCO World Heritage Sites 2 Proposed 3 in Danger See also Legacy of the Roman Empire v t e Italy articles History Overview Timeline of Italian history By topic Citizenship Currency and coinage Economy Fashion Flags Genetic Historic states Judaism LGBT Military Music Name Postage Railways Prehistory Prehistory Neolithic Villanovan Terramare Rinaldone Apennine Nuragic Golasecca Canegrate Latial Ancient Ancient peoples Italic peoples Latins Osci Picentes Samnites Umbri Veneti Etruscans Celts Magna Graecia Ligures Messapians Ancient Rome Kingdom Republic Roman conquest Roman Italy Empire Western Empire Middle Ages Middle Ages Italy under Odoacer Ostrogoths Byzantium Lombards Papal States the Holy Roman Empire the Sardinian Judicates Arabs Normans Guelphs and Ghibellines Lombard League Kingdom of Sicily War of the Sicilian Vespers Kingdom of Naples Early modern Italian citystates Florence Siena Milan Maritime republics Venice Genoa Pisa Amalfi Kingdom of Sardinia Grand Duchy of Tuscany Duchy of Savoy Renaissance Italian Wars Early Modern period Napoleonic Italy Austrian occupation and Kingdom of LombardyVenetia Kingdom of the Two Sicilies Late modern Unification First War of Independence Second War of Independence Niard exodus Expedition of the Thousand Proclamation of the Kingdom of Italy Third War of Independence Capture of Rome Monarchy and the World Wars Kingdom of Italy Colonial Empire World War I Fourth War of Independence Fascist Italy World War II Resistance and Social Republic Civil War Contemporary Republic Institutional referendum IstrianDalmatian exodus Economic Boom Years of Lead Maxi Trial Mani pulite Coronavirus pandemic Geography Italian geographical region Peninsula Climate Climate change Geology Fauna Flora Mountains Prealps Alps Apennines Volcanism Volcanoes Beaches Canals Caves Earthquakes Islands Lakes Marine protected areas National parks Regional parks Rivers Valleys Subdivisions Central Lazio Marche Tuscany Umbria Northern Italy Northeast EmiliaRomagna FriuliVenezia Giulia TrentinoAlto AdigeSdtirol Veneto Northwest Aosta Valley Liguria Lombardy Piedmont Southern Italy South Abruzzo Apulia Basilicata Calabria Campania Molise Insular Sardinia Sicily Politics Constitution Elections Foreign relations Government Human rights LGBT rights Judiciary Law Law enforcement Military Nationality Parliament Political parties President List Prime Minister List Council of Ministers Regions Provinces Metropolitan cities Cities Comune Municipalities Security and intelligence Economy Economy Italian regions by GDP Agriculture Automotive industry Banking Banks Central Bank Brands Companies Energy Exports Science and technology Stock exchange Taxation Telecommunications Tourism Trade unions Transport air rail road Welfare Wine Society Aristocracy Censorship Corruption Crime Demographics Education Emigration and diaspora Gambling Health Healthcare Immigration Inventions and discoveries Italians People Languages Italian Regional Life expectancy Orders decorations and medals Poverty Prostitution Public administration Racism Religion Social class Terrorism Water supply and sanitation Women Culture Duecento Trecento Quattrocento Cinquecento Seicento Settecento Ottocento Anthem Architecture Art Castles Cathedrals Cinema Coat of arm Cuisine Design Fashion Flag Folklore Gardens Internet Italophilia Libraries Literature Media Museums Music Mythology National symbols Palaces Philosophy Public holidays Sport Television Theatre Traditions World Heritage Sites Italy portal Category v t e List of historic states of Italy PreRoman period Etruscan civilization Etruria Samnites Latins Osci Celts Cisalpine Gaul Veneti Ligures Nuragic civilization Umbri Magna Graecia Iapygians Picentes Ancient Rome Roman Kingdom 753 BC509 BC Roman Republic 509 BC27 BC Roman Empire 27 BC395 AD Western Roman Empire 395476 AD Medieval and Early Modern states Barbarian kingdoms 476774 Odoacers rule 476493 Ostrogothic rule 493553 Vandal rule 435534 Lombard rule 568774 Duchy of Benevento Duchy of Friuli Duchy of Ivrea Duchy of Spoleto Duchy of Tridentum Duchy of Tuscia Byzantine Empire 584751 Exarchate of Ravenna 584751 Duchy of Rome 533751 Duchy of Perugia 554752 Duchy of the Pentapolis 554752 Exarchate of Africa 585698 Papal States 7541870 Patrimony of Saint Peter Campagna e Marittima Province Holy See Duchy of Castro Duchy of Ferrara Duchy of Parma and Piacenza Duchy of Urbino Holy Roman Empire and other independent states Bishopric of Bressanone Corsican Republic City of Fiume and its District County of Gorizia Princely County of Gorizia and Gradisca County of Guastalla County of Santa Fiora Duchy of Guastalla Kingdom of Italy Ancona Ceva Finale March of Friuli Patria del Friuli Patriarchate of Aquileia Ivrea Istria Mantua Milan March of Montferrat Duchy of Montferrat Trieste Turin Tuscany Verona Duchy of Ivrea Duchy of Mantua Duchy of Massa and Carrara Duchy of Merania Duchy of Mirandola Duchy of Modena and Reggio Principality of Piombino Duchy of Reggio Marquisate of Saluzzo Duchy of Spoleto Bishopric of Tarantasia PrinceBishopric of Trento Grand Duchy of Tuscany Savoyard state Savoy County of Savoy Piedmont Duchy of Aosta County of Nice County of Tenda Republic of Venice 6971797 Dogado Domini di Terraferma Stato da Mr Other Republics c.10001797 Republic of Cospaia Republic of Florence Republic of Lucca Republic of Massa Republic of Siena Republic of Genoa Republic of Noli Republic of Pisa Republic of Ancona Southern Italy 7741139 Byzantine Duchy of Amalfi Duchy of Gaeta Catepanate of Italy Longobardia Theme of Lucania Duchy of Naples Theme of Sicily and Byzantine Sicily Duchy of Sorrento Arab Emirate of Bari Emirate of Sicily Lombard Principality of Benevento Principality of Salerno Principality of Capua Norman County of Apulia and Calabria County of Aversa County of Sicily Principality of Taranto Sardinia from the 
9 th century Judicates Agugliastra Arborea Cagliari Gallura Logudoro Oristano Republic of Sassari Kingdom of Sardinia 13241861 Kingdom of Sicily 11301816 and Kingdom of Naples 12821816 State of the Presidi Duke of San Donato Duchy of Sora Principality of Taranto Terra Sancti Benedicti Neapolitan Republic 16471648 Hospitaller Malta Gozo Malta Protectorate Crown Colony of Malta French Revolutionary and Napoleonic eras 17921815 Republics Cisalpinia Cispadania Italy Liguria Lucca Parthenopea Piedmont Rome Subalpinia Transpadania Monarchies Benevento Etruria Guastalla Italy Lucca and Piombino Massa and Carrara Naples Pontecorvo Tuscany Elba Corsica PostNapoleonic states Duchy of Genoa 18151848 Duchy of Lucca 18151847 Duchy of Massa and Carrara 18141829 Duchy of Modena and Reggio 18141859 Duchy of Parma and Piacenza 18141859 Grand Duchy of Tuscany 18151859 Italian United Provinces 1831 Provisional Government of Milan 1848 Republic of San Marco 18481849 Roman Republic 18491850 United Provinces of Central Italy 18591860 Kingdom of Sardinia 18141860 Kingdom of the Two Sicilies 18161861 Kingdom of LombardyVenetia 18151866 Papal States 18141870 Postunification Kingdom of Italy 18611946 Italian Empire 18821960 Free State of Fiume 19201924 Italian Social Republic 19431945 Free Territory of Trieste 19471954 v t e Western world and culture Foundations Cradle of civilization Old World GrecoRoman world Greece Hellenistic Kingdoms Rome Roman Empire Western Eastern Roman legacy Romanization RomanoGermanic culture Christendom History European Bronze Age Classical antiquity Late antiquity Middle Ages early high late Renaissance Early modern period Age of Discovery Reformation Age of Enlightenment Scientific Revolution Late modern period Age of Revolution Romanticism Abolitionism Emancipation Capitalism Industrial Revolution Great Divergence Modern era Modernism World War I Interwar period Universal suffrage World War II Cold War PostCold War era Information age War on terror Culture Alphabet Greek Latin Cyrillic Architecture Art Periods Calendar Cuisine Diet Classical tradition Studies Clothing History Dance Esotericism Astrology Folklore Immigration Law Languages Eurolinguistics Standard Average European Literature Canon Media Internet Music Chant Classical Folk Mythology Painting contemporary Philosophy Science Values Physical culture Sport Religion EastWest Schism Western Christianity Decline Secularism Philosophy Ancient Greek philosophy Hellenistic philosophy Ancient Roman philosophy JudeoChristian ethics Christian philosophy Scholasticism Rationalism Empiricism Existentialism Christian existentialism Humanism Christian humanism Secular humanism Liberalism Conservatism Socialism Continental philosophy Analytic philosophy Poststructuralism Tolerance Paradox Relativism Peritrope Atlanticism Values Religion Abrahamic Judaism Culture Christianity Culture WesternEastern Catholic Church Latin Church Eastern Orthodoxy Greek Orthodox Church Protestantism Islam Culture Cultural Muslim Bbism Azali Bah Druze Mandaeism Rastafari Samaritanism Paganism Baltic Celtic Finnish Germanic AngloSaxon Frankish Gothic Old Norse Hellenistic Roman Slavic Neo Agnosticism Atheism Law Natural law Rule of law Equality before the law Constitutionalism Human rights Life Thought Speech Press Religion Property Democracy International law Contemporary integration ABCANZ Armies AngloPortuguese Alliance ANZUS Arctic Council AUKUS Baltic Assembly Benelux BritishIrish Council Bucharest Nine Council of Europe Craiova Group EEA EFTA ESA EU EU Customs Union Eurozone EUUK Trade and Cooperation Agreement Five Eyes G7 Lancaster House Treaties Lublin Triangle NATO Nordic Council OAS OSCE Pacific Islands Forum PROSULPROSUR Rio Treaty Schengen Special Relationship Three Seas Initiative USMCA Visegrd Group West Nordic Council Western Bloc Western European and Others Group Westernization Authority control databases International FAST 2 VIAF 2 WorldCat National Spain France BnF data Germany Israel United States Sweden Japan Czech Republic Croatia Poland Other Historical Dictionary of Switzerland IdRef Retrieved from httpsen.wikipedia.orgwindex.phptitleAncientRomeoldid1222861469 Categories Ancient Rome Ancient history 
8 thcentury BC establishments in Italy 
5 thcentury disestablishments Classical civilizations States and territories disestablished in the 
5 th century Former empires Hidden categories Pages using the EasyTimeline extension Webarchive template wayback links Articles containing Latinlanguage text Wikipedia articles incorporating a citation from the 1911 Encyclopaedia Britannica with Wikisource reference CS1 Italianlanguage sources it All articles with dead external links Articles with dead external links from January 2024 Articles with short description Short description is different from Wikidata EngvarB from October 2022 Use dmy dates from October 2022 Pages using multiple image with auto scaled images CS1 long volume value Commons category link from Wikidata Articles with FAST identifiers Articles with VIAF identifiers Articles with WorldCat Entities identifiers Articles with BNE identifiers Articles with BNF identifiers Articles with BNFdata identifiers Articles with GND identifiers Articles with J
9 U identifiers Articles with LCCN identifiers Articles with Libris identifiers Articles with NDL identifiers Articles with NKC identifiers Articles with NSK identifiers Articles with PLWABN identifiers Articles with HDS identifiers Articles with SUDOC identifiers Articles which contain graphical timelines This page was last edited on 8 May 2024 at 1054 UTC. Text is available under the Creative Commons AttributionShareAlike License 
4.0  additional terms may apply. By using this site you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation Inc. a nonprofit organization. Privacy policy About Wikipedia Disclaimers Contact Wikipedia Code of Conduct Developers Statistics Cookie statement Mobile view Toggle limited content width